A bigger and more important difference is the Xeon's have much more L2 cache.
Fool me once, shame on you. Fool me twice, shame on me. -Zach Braff on preteens
Same here. Wife and two kids 
good job
OK, then what about the "tag" solution? Put a tag on questions. Then you get the help of a large community, and using the css of the subreddit people can opt out of seeing those posts.
Add broodwar to the bunch with a bit of Super Smash Bro. Melee and I'm in. :P
Are You Being Served Again (a.k.a Grace and Favour)  SCTV - All volumes. Was lucky enough to grab 'Christmas With SCTV' on holiday in Canada last year, and Strange Brew from eBay, so at least I get a fix until I can afford to start with the collections.  Tales From the Crypt seasons 1, 6 and 7 (for the sake of completing the collection).  Codco, though I don't think it's ever been released on DVD.  A Muppet Family Christmas. Just because of the silly nostalgia trip I get when I think of it.  That's about as far as I can narrow it down, unfortunately, so not five induvidual DVDs. Just purchased the last addition to (now complete) Kids in the Hall collection, and have more movies than I could ever dream to watch.
So your CU charges $5 a month for debit card use? Is this common amongst CU's? Because I thought the point of this whole which-bank-should-we-switch-to thing was to AVOID debit card fees somehow. Aren't the big banks charging for debit card use? I'm looking to switch soon (I bank with Region's and they're implementing debit card charges starting Oct) and was under the impression that a CU doesn't charge...
Specact doesn't seem that great to me.   A fucking dinosaur though... Tempting.
With the right commentators for sure!
oooh i LOVE this. like, seriously, madly, deeply LOVE this. just stunning &lt;3 thank you thank you for sharing!!
All this hype makes it seem like r/jailbait is full of pics of 6 year olds or something. It's mainly just high school girls in bikinis. Most of them are probably legal in a lot of countries.
Yes, high level pissing competitions are pretty hard in the end game as well.
? Call of duty black ops uses steam. he borrowed his friends steam account and downloaded it on his computer.
I meant without layering, sorry!   Yeah, layers are essential in colder temps (winter goose/duck season)
I don't understand what's going on…
Except that she is way out of her league when dealing with these amounts of money. This is only going to end badly, especially after what happened in the last episode. 
There was a singer of a hardcore band who wasn't expecting a pile on to happen for gang vocals when he held the mic out?
ah it was just a crappy little tumbler glass.. Though I'm not sure how exactly he managed it....
About $100 a week for my wife and me. More if you include household goods like cleaning products, paper towels, etc.
I'm really sorry.   
Obviously that requires he be killed. Flawless.
The main thing is let them know that they can succeed. Many kids in those situations don't even try to do well because they don't think they're intelligent enough, or know they are but don't want to be because it's not socially acceptable. I know people from the worst schools in the area (which isn't saying much, admittedly) who passed the acceptance test and got in, and kids from the best with rich parents and tutoring who didn't.   Beyond that, I can only thank you for doing a hugely important job and caring about your kids beyond their test scores. That's a huge thing for kids lucky enough to realize what a gift it is. Without some of the teachers I had I would have had no chance.
Bring the boys home.
Dr_Rambo_PhD hit it on the nose. He sent me [here](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/laankejkbhbdhmipfmgcngdelahlfoji). I'm telling you just in case you don't read the comments.
Why not? People will have their phones with them and they'll be uploaded within minutes across all sorts of platform: Facebook, flickr and what not. And within a couple of more minutes the pictures would probably be seen and backed up by people outside of the United States and reuploaded. Then over the course of a single day the image can easily go viral all across the globe, so I don't see how the media would ignore it.
Do you expect to achieve your goals before or after you decide what your goals are?
wow i like THIS
CatsPajamas or Doa would do nicely
[~~Maybe, not sure.~~](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/ktywm/im_a_man_and_i_want_to_talk_about_your_vagina/)  [SashimiX to the rescue](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/ktqai/im_a_guy_and_i_want_to_talk_about_your_vagina/)
I often hear them running across our wooden floors &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Matt Taibbi has [some](http://www.rollingstone.com/politics/blogs/taibblog/holiday-in-scambodia-20110720) [great](http://www.rollingstone.com/politics/blogs/taibblog/evil-corporate-tax-holiday-gains-bipartisan-support-20110726) [articles](http://www.rollingstone.com/politics/blogs/taibblog/evil-corporate-tax-holiday-deal-still-alive-20110804) explaining why the repatriation tax holiday is a terrible idea. Once it's clear that this sort of thing will happen on a regular basis, why would any rational corporation pay taxes at all? Funny that conservatives are so quick to understand adverse incentives with respect to welfare, unemployment benefits, healthcare, immigration, etc.
If you get a Welsh Corgi, you have to name it Ein
When ever you need him.
very true. I was talking training. I got to use one to blow up a buried water tank they were using as a cache point. thats when i gained a respect for them. it tore that thing a new one.
Replace it with working out and reading.  
DOWNPLAY DOWNPLAY! you are the fucking scum of the earth! SUPPORT OUR FUCKING TROOPS YOU DICK!
You totally missed my point. You should have backed out of the thread when people started discussing the wives. I don't understand how you didn't reach that decision on your own.  And no, personally, spoilers ruin nothing for me. Also, I didn't spoil anything for anyone, so I don't know what you're getting at telling me to take a few seconds before posting spoilers. I'm just a guy coming in after the fact to tell you that you're naive and you should be more aware of what you're reading, as opposed to bitching at people for having a discussion.
There's a difference between purely anarchist and mostly liberal.
jesus christ is it breaking bad repost day?
I've been using vibrams as running shoes for over a year now, and as running shoes, they're awesome.  They improved my running form, and my calves are huge now, too.  But they are absolutely awful for playing ultimate in.  On a grass surface, it's just like playing barefoot; you'll slip around and have trouble cutting hard.  It's actually dangerous to play in them, same with playing barefoot.  It's really easy to pull muscles (esp. groin &amp; hammies) or slip and fall.  Or even get stepped on.  Ouch.  Vibrams *do not* work on hard surfaces either.  It feels exactly the same changing directions in them as it does barefoot.  You'll want to slow down first, get balanced, and then turn and push.  Again the slipping and falling, also busting up your toes real bad.  Best bet for hard surfaces are *tennis shoes*.  They have the most support, and they are built for exactly the kind of running you want to do; quick cutting forward and back or side to side.  It might feel weird with such a big shoe, but it's the right choice.
&gt;"You are a follower of man. "  Excuse me?
Roger!
I like the Blue Bomber ones. They help you identify the bad drivers at a glance.   HEYOOOOOO
Thank you :]  The pineapples just make me smile!
But it should make you a very very versatile player. 
I was really hoping he would have put a troll there with a canadian quarter.
But people break the rules all the time. The front page has had more than its fair share of things that aren't comics in the last 2 months, like the Ragenstein Monster (which even became the background image), a Soapbox Ranting Poster about not upvoting (which became the number one comic in the sub-reddit). Each and every day, the front page is just girls telling us about their day (a substitute for their diary). The top comic RIGHT NOW is a repost from July.  I'm sorry if this doesn't meet the quality standards, I'll try harder next time. It just irks me how far down the quality of these comics sank in just a few short months. Why are some folk, but not others allowed to break the rules.  Much respect by the way, I appreciate your work.
And what's his tumblr then...?
Possibly.
uh oh! someones lucky.
Cirque de tortues
What did you think of the Pumking?
Thank you for this chance, really appreciate it!
Depends on how wet I've been made.
Superhuman reflexes.... WOW!  I'm too gullible.
love the nugget nectar
it's an attempt to relate behavioral patterns to math problems, which only serves to strip the behavioral patterns of their inherent complexity and invalidating the consideration entirely. 
My sound card packed in a few days ago so this will go into the favourites until I can afford a new one. Cheers!
That's it.  Now I want to have children.  Preferably Italian ones.
I've been there. My situation was totally different but yet the emotions you go through with the cheating was the same. 
Steele: What's this Sargn't? Another taxpayer-funded Delta safari?   Sanderson: Not if General Garrison's askin'.   Steele: No, I'm askin'.   Sanderson: Have a nice meal, captain. 
Sounds familiar, but it was a long time and many bong hits ago
This isn't a comic.
Is that one of those red light cameras being sent to hell? If so good riddance. 
It's more likely than you think...
As another chess reference, Tad Williams wrote, Otherland a sci-fi series about characters who get trapped in a VR machine; in trying to find their way out; they have to traipse through a series of VR worlds; one of which is a chess game.  The pieces were AI characters, but they had a complete world of their own.  One of the bishops was a spy, one of the queens was having an affair, et cetera.  They lived in eternal war; and whenever one side won...the world was restored to balance, and the war begun again.
I agree, like he said, now is the time to try it! 
No he didn't. They are both retarded.
Indeed *whoosh*.  My eyes skipped right over the strkethrough.
If you could go back in time and stop yourself from going to TNA, would you?  What would you change about the current wrestling product, if anything? 
She was annoying idiot. I couldn't stand her for the entire season she was on the show. I get that trying out a new companion that was abrasive and not falling in love with the Doctor was a great idea, but she was just literally really dumb. Her bitchiness didn't bother me, it was the lack of intelligence and just general getting-in-the-wayness. 
I downvoted this. Not because it's not a cool website, BUT BECAUSE IM SO FREAKIN TIRED OF SEEING THE LINK!
NOTHING BUT FATTIES.
That is an apt way to describe him yes.
Note: This is drawing on all the good things I liked about my ex's and what I'm looking for in a future girl.  The feeling I get around her.  There are just some people who I like who I am when I'm around them because of what they bring out in me.  Someone that makes me feel calm and settled to be around, someone genuinely true to themselves, a sense of humor is a must...  A laugh that I'd do anything to hear and a smile just for me.  Does that help or did you want physical stuff?
Thank you. Illustrates how much of a turd he is. 
Easier to list the great classics that I have seen. Psycho, The Maltese Falcon, The African Queen, Outlaw Josey Wales, Fistful of Dollars, Gone with the Wind. I am ashamed, I call myself a lover of movies but I never can seem to muster up the desire to watch old movies for some reason.
Oh, sounded like he took the shield off the bearings.  Either way, I like it.
Have you ever thought about seeking professional help? 
I know who you are and where you live
Firstly, I speak from experience, since over the last 10 years of my life I have had at least one hundred and fifty magic mushroom trips, experimenting with anything from Liberty Caps in the UK (where I first took them) to Psilocybe Subaeruginosa 'subs' in Australia (where i reside now) and everything inbetween; Thai, Filipino, Columbian, Peruvian, Mexican, Truffles. You name it.  I can say that out of all of those trips I have had three or four completely life changing experiences. These are the days you decide to dose big and strap yourself in for the ride. Nothing anyone can say or do will prepare you for a complete loss of self &amp; time as you thought you knew them. Complete Ego dissolution is quite a curious experience, to put it lightly, and if it's the first time you experience it you usually have a hard time 'letting go' of the self and all the things (material possessions) which you hold so tragically close to your heart. You will realise that all that is, was and will ever be is the eternal now. No past, no future, just raw awareness.   My last large dose &amp; a highly recommended experience: 15g wet (around ~4g dry) Psilocybin Atlantis truffles in Amsterdam. Hire bikes. Consume on the picturesque riverways whilst riding to the Vondelpark. Ride around the Vondelpark on the most magical bike ride of your life while colours and sounds explode in front of you and humanity and nature show every angle of themselves to you at once. A few photos from this day to share: http://imgur.com/a/8xwNb  It is my personal opinion that if everyone had JUST ONE decent dose of Psiloc(in|ybin) at some point in their journey from the crache to the crematorium, the world would be a much happier place.  tl;dr Psilocybin + right setting * high dose  = -ego + realisation that you are the eternal now.
Good question.  It was given to service members who since 1 January 1946 have served in Antarctica for scientific endeavors and/or exploration(it probably really sucked to be stationed in Antarctica for years on end).  As to its precedence, during the 40s-60s a lot of significant research was done at that time.  In almost 15 years, I have never seen anyone with this medal however. 
From now on, we should only answer with smiley faces otherwise ueblong2matt will track us down and torture us. Sweet.
Don't have to be rude just because i'm pointing out that you are writing something wrong. Could have easily been avoided if you just have called this "Downloading BF3 Beta", instead you have to add in Demo and destroy everything. After that you go and call me who kindly told you not to call a beta a demo an "ass whore"? what do that even mean?
The site has always been spammy, it is a marketing guy ripping off starting strength. 
&gt;"banks made money on loans that were pure crap."   Just to clarify this should really be. "Banks were forced to make crap loans, knew they were crap, and unloaded them as fast as possible."  &gt;"investment banks sold that crap bundled up in credit swaps and their ilk."  You probably should have said mortgage backed securities. Credit default swaps are bought after the fact. Mostly by AIG during this time. &gt;"Everything is wrong with both the bank and the marketer of the swap being made largely whole by the bailout while the regulations are rewritten to avoid the truth that is balance sheets that are still loaded down with tons of shit assets and Uncle Sam now the proud owner of over 250,000 foreclosed home." Easier to just say that rating agencies and the SEC didn't do their jobs. I actually don't have a problem with uncle Sam owning this turd bucket. They were the creators of the problems so they get to carry the product of the problem they created. &gt;"So yea. Screw the banks and CDO they rode in on." Remember, banks were damn near forced to take on these loans. They were required for these sub prime mortgages to pretty much underwrite them blind folded to many any sense. No bank wants to make a deal on a guaranteed foreclosure (which is what they pretty much were). Foreclosures are very messy and expensive process sometimes lasting for years. I work in real estate so I know this all to well. Banks do everything they can to avoid foreclosures. When they foreclose they are very lucky to even break even.  Otherwise I agree with you.   Also, you didn't mention the naive and ignorant home buyers who bought into home that were obviously way out of their league. Common sense isn't all that common though.
MAYBE YOU SHOULD GET FAVRE TO BE YOUR FULLBACK?
I don't get it???
My shoulder always feels more like a pop than a crack. I'm afraid one day I'll dislocate it doing this.
I would drop Knowshon. He hasn't been completely healthy all year and is losing (more) ground to Willis Mcgahee.  Someone dropped Mario Manningham? what?
I couldn't hear anything at first until I moved the sound slider on the page.
I followed this guide: http://backcountrybeacon.com/2011/03/how-to-make-a-ski-pole-mount-for-a-gopro-for-under-1/   but instead of a ski pole, I bought a broom from the drug store for like $10 , screwed off the broom part, and used the broomstick  results:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=q5NrgDz1Wyk&amp;feature=channel_video_title
These dimensions are all around us. The strictly 3D space will be completely flat and empty, every particle in it or even photon of subtle gravity lens is violating its flatness, i.e. its three-dimensionality. The inverse square law is valid only for forces acting in strictly 3D space, every short distance force violating the ISL is manifestation of extradimensions again.   http://tinyurl.com/2uc4pe9  In Czech we have a proverb "*The darkest place is under the candlestick*", which roughly means, the most common subjects are least obvious for common observers - just because they're so common.
not only food but a TON of water bottles. I think snoop knows how to plan ahead.
I did it once and i felt bad, destroyed and stopped doing it.
I love tickle fights. He's way more ticklish than me, though. He can pretty much only get me if he can tickle my hips or the backs of my thighs. I can get him all over. So much fun.
[Here! HERE! **OVER HERE!**](http://images.cheezburger.com/completestore/2011/4/15/bfa856ae-c797-4427-a1f5-535345b8ab13.gif)
As a pro CS:S player myself, I agree completely... caseyfoster is a douchebag though... however i do like you DaZeD :]
Corruptors and hope for the best. Infestors are pretty bad against the deathball now so I don't like them in the ZvP matchup that much.  Work toward a hive by 15-17 minutes and broodlord can also be effective. Basically you can't let the protoss sit back and mass up units, you need to be constantly poking and prodding at his base trying to disrupt him without losing too many units.
A book that contains all the potion recipes? You must be crazy. There's thousands of them!
Try out [this one.](world8-4.ca) It's a great server, with great mod's.
Murphy's Law'd!
The shame of being too fat to lay on a pull out sofa? The pain of having the bar underneath assault your back on the way down?
Gangsta cat is not amused...
what does dfc stand for?
There is a God.
I thought that stuff was closed down long time ago.
Tokutek is a valid database company regardless of whether this particular person always posts for them.  I personally follow tokutek closely as they have some very interesting things going on. Their TokuDB engine for mysql is interesting all by itself.  Also, this particular post was written by a guest, Baron Schwartz, founder of Percona, a competitor to Tokutek in the same space. So no matter how you spin this, it's not merely marketing. It's also not spam if it's relevant.  Don't get me wrong, I don't think all of tokuteks blog posts are worthy of reddit, i've downvoted a few myself. But I also don't think that just because that's all this person posts, regardless of relevance, that it should not be in /r/database.  *edit: grammar
Tingle. [Wait a minute. . . .](http://2.bp.blogspot.com/_md7-1kaasuY/SuSTXx_UxuI/AAAAAAAAAkI/so6ipf7ugOg/s320/Image1.jpg)
You don't need to quote me Romo's numbers, I've been quoting them a lot myself recently.  As far as Bradford, he is a dink and dunk passer right now because the Rams have no receivers that are both a deep threat and able to catch the ball.  Denario this year but he can't play 2 games in a row.  Not to mention the guy is a second year player on a team that was 1-15 2 years ago.  Romo is a better QB today.  Probably a better QB next year and a decent chance he will be the year after that.  4 or 5 years from now and I think Bradford will better as long as the Rams can get the right personnel around him.  And if we are talking about just this year I would take him over all but 4 or 5 guys.  Bradford is not one of those 5.  As I said, I like Romo, I'm not one of the haters.  I've spent the last 3 weeks defending his 4th quarter play in the regular season and the fact that he isn't solely to blame for the teams' woes.  That said, Bradford has enough promise if not more than any other young QB in the league today.
What.... is..... this....? A CENTER FOR ANTS?!?!?!?
FUNDEMETALLY
From a terrible submission to terrible comments.   Perfect submission.
short lived 2-3 hours??? fuck i sober up like 45 mins after i smoke.
and you apparently failed to read the very next sentence which says what I've been trying to explain word for word. "Some prefer more overwhelming narcotic type effects, allowing the resin glands to cloud and begin to amber or darken to increase overall cannabinoid content."  most clubs i've been to only test THC content so yeah, growers are all hyped on getting their ''%'' the highest but.. GOOD clubs test the CBNs and CBDs and post those results on the bud as well.
the trolls are working hard to make sure this doesn't get much play on the main page...
And it's even more annoying when you're working midnight shifts and being awoken by these calls.
So? He's still the mouthpiece.
just FYI I work on wall st and I haven't seen any of the protesters...where are you guys?
Enh, the bulk of people admitted to MIT can pass all their classes without ever attending them or talking to any classmates or professors. They'll have wasted their money and their time, though.
One near me gives 4%. If it wasn't so damn inconvenient to have a credit union, I'd totally switch. 
And SaviOr fixed his matches and drew in multiple other progamers to do the same, single handedly almost bringing down the BW scene.  It seems appropriate.
Bread was worth more than gold during those days!  I don't know whether you or your grandpa will find this interesting, but my grandmother and my great grandmother used to bake bread for the Jews who were in held in a camp in Alytus, Lithuania.   My grandmother, Zina, was the oldest child. She was barely 14 years old and she with three of her younger brothers (Peter, Vitaliy and Tolia) would sneak in at night to deliver loafs of bread to Jews who were stuck behind the barbed wire. My grandmother was Russian old believer but all of her friends with who she had spent her childhood in the Lithuanian countryside were Jews who were stuck in the camp so she simply wanted to help her friends out.  Eventually my grandma and her family got caught and they ended up being held in the camp for over one year until the Nazis have retreated, because the Russians were advancing.   After my grandmother got freed she reunited with her old friends and they have been friends ever since. Shes either 83 or 84 now and she still enjoys an afternoon tea with some of her friends from WWII.   Ohh man I wish my grandma knew how to use scanner so she could scan some pictures with her hommies enjoying a drink after the war so I could show them to the community :/  I study in UK at the moment and I can't get access to the pics that are in LTU :/
Not any of those, but it gives me somewhere to start, thank you!  No specific instruments -- it's very heavily synthesized. It's like the piece I posted more in the general "feel" and the pace. I've tried humming it and tapping it out, but it's just too fast-paced.
Prince's [Darling Nikki](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wEoYKYA9oHE) covered by Foo Fighters.  It's fucking incredible.
Light sometimes acts like a particle (like in solar cells) and sometimes acts like a wave (like in double-slit diffraction). It doesn't need a medium to travel through.  Sound needs a medium with mass to travel through - sound is essentially pressure waves.  Pressure waves can propagate through air, water, metal, etc. But as inc114 said, light is made up of electric and magnetic fields that oscillate.  The fields don't need any medium to exist - they exist within vacuum, air, water, metal, and other materials. Visible light occupies one bit of the electromagnetic spectrum.  Others include infrared light (longer wavelengths), ultraviolet light (shorter wavelengths), radio, x-rays, and others.  All these types of radiation are fundamentally the same.  Light just happens to have the right wavelength that your eyes can pick it up and interpret it. Does that answer your question?
Gross
Also, what do you think about Google AdWords?
or posts on reddit...
Never played starcraft so I don't understand the game play. But if Halo or games like Battlefield or COD were being shown I would definitely watch. 
You can just buy it and have it mailed to a US address.  Then have them mail it to you.
Yeah, I thought that after I posted it. Definitely an underrated band though, I feel like nobody has heard of them. Either way, knew most would enjoy it here.
I'd much rather watch golf during primetime then people playing Starcraft.  However, if it was a tournament (or MLG) I would watch it on the regular. 
I would point out that anybody who has ever looked at a US Passport should know that joining  the military of another country is grounds for dismissal of US Citizenship. Of course, Al Qaeda isn't a military but it seems to me to be close enough that if they had wanted to revoke his citizenship, they could have. 
Sure is! I have walked past that fire station for 20 years now. They all just sit out front in lawn chairs. 
and see how many movies you can get through before you die?
mean girls ??...really ?? ..ok
the last emperor OST easily. david byrne and ryuichi sakamoto working together?! thank you based god!
I wonder if the last thing that guard thought was "Earn it."
[One of the only times I haven't scoffed at it](http://xlegit.files.wordpress.com/2011/02/andre-3000.jpg)
And today he learned to get a case
They got a new bassist. 
You become the one. A relationship isn't about finding the perfect partner, it's about being the perfect partner.
Wow. I'm going to start the switch ASAP.
ahhhh yes, i've read em just forgot about tom.
Could it be true? a game developer who ACTUALLY listens to its players? IT IS! 
I think he meant Vincent but wrote Barret (Vincent is unlockable, after all).
&gt;We took an oath to protect the people  Really? Unless things have changed from eleven years ago, I don't remember taking an oath to protect "the people."
She's the kinkiest Carrie Anne Moss lookalike i've ever seen.   Verified.
From personal experience, it absolutely works. And it's absolutely terrifying when you discover the first one.
C'mon, there's something for everyone! All the FAers could come, no worries since the city's half empty. Good restaurants and obscure bands and artists for all the Hipster Redditors - you can say you liked Detroit BEFORE it was cool. Awesome AWESOME baseball in the spring/summer/fall for all our sports fans. And of course there's always breaking into the old empty buildings - my brothers and I love doing it. It's awesomeee.   (And for those who can't handle the city, there's always Royal Oak and Ann Arbor just down the road.)
I got soft androgyne. I was expecting to get something more femme but whatever!
Being exposed to more things and more people and their amazingly different views has been nothing but depressing.  Life was better in the past - I was younger and didn't know how much the world sucked.
I'm up for it!
Every hole is a hole for your penis.
Or rather, the illusion of it.
Have any of your clients ever made a move on you? As in a father trying to have an affair or something of the sort.
sure could have been. your point?
The creator of a subreddit is the de facto owner. She controls it. If you don't like how it's going there you can create your own. That's the position the admins have adopted. I think this goes back to when /r/trees was created because of the attitudes of the /r/marijuana creator/moderator.   Those 400k people can just click a link and subscribe to the new subreddit. It's not the end of the world. It's only a web site. How do you know the guy did it for attention? 
But Two and a Half Men and Big Bang Theory already do such a good job of this.
oh man. the wfmu library has apparently contained some horrifying shit.
not to take away from this guys story but my dad was from odessa, ukraine around this time and his family fled to i think it was either kazakhstan or uzbekistan while the nazi's invaded ukraine (`43 i think).  After the war they returned home to odessa and more or less just went on living their lives.  my dad was only like 5 when they returned so i don't know how much was changed but he used to say they'd find all sorts of military equipment around the city all the time (weapons, ammo, vehicles, etc)
I really liked Summer, but Nathan was also very good.  To be honest I liked all of their performances.  If we're including Serenity, then the operative (Chiwetel Ejiofor) is my favourite villain in anything. I loved his performance.
Has anyone tried the beta yet? I got into battlefield with bad company, and battlefield 3 just doesn't seem like battlefield. Granted the 360 beta only has one map demoed right now there are no vehicles, but the map doesn't even have any destructible... anything.   Here's hoping that this just pertains to one map.
"Guys, we need more terror ideas to scare the public with." "OK, how about.. a guy with a bomb in his underwear, and we'll do it on Christmas?" "That's the stupidest idea this week." "Meh, the public are so stupid, they'll believe anything." "You're right, let's get this going."
I like how Emma is Emma, but Daniel is "Harry". 
Im jelly.
Still no key for me =(
It was my understanding that it was comparable to rifle ammo these days.
yeah i shout the words but i normally dont do it with an angry face, its more like this :D
how in the hell were you won over by "Fish fingers and custard"?  11 has some fantastic moments.  That wasn't one of them.
when i get there!! international pizza's stress me to the max!
:(
The people you pass *might* form an opinion about you for about 3 seconds.  Then they forget.  I really can honestly say I don't give most people a second thought when I'm just passing them unless there are extreamly unique or hot.  Who cares what other people think about you anyway? Most people probally think I'm a badass, but they're wrong, just a normal dude.
I have a cat that looks exactly like that! And his name is Chesty just like your username. Weird...
Don't have a child before you are prepared.
Well done.
I somersaulted a hobie 16 in less than 12 parsecs!
They like to bite me.
i did this in my class so i didn't have time to do the rest of your request. I would be happy to try and improve it on monday if you did a sketch of what you actually wanted
I am NOT implying, and I made this clear, that we should remove saved games from existing games.  That would, indeed, be a horrible design decision.  What I'm saying is we should stop designing games around having a save-game system.  We should design non-linear games in which winning and losing are both a real possibility.  I'm also NOT advocating for games "taking longer to play", in fact, just the opposite.  By stripping story out of a game, you can get right into it and have nothing but interesting decision after interesting decision - efficiency!  I highly recommend you check out Tetris or the board game 7 Wonders for an example of what I mean.  &gt;Then don't load from save if you don't like this feature.  Games are specifically ABOUT discovering what the optimal moves are - *mastery*.  To expect the players to NOT use the most overpowered weapon ever wielded in the HISTORY of all games - the save file - is not reasonable, at all.  Here's what I advocate:  A return to the fundamentals of what games are.  A game is a system of rules, in which agents COMPETE by making interesting, meaningful decisions.  Yes, I think building a game around story (as in, plot-points) is a bad idea, because then you are tying down a non-linear, emergent system to a linear course of events, to various degrees.  I'm not totally against "saves" - Mount &amp; Blade's "Save &amp; Exit" is just fine.  I AM against allowing players to go back on their decisions, because that means that their decisions simply do not matter.  And yeah, I think check-points have the same problem.
Host: mumble.redditgaming.com:64738
This is not good news. Knowing me, I'd rather die on the hill than give up the fight. I'm usually triumphant, but we'll see how this goes. Thank you for the advice.
Only if it's on TSN2 for my Canadian comrades. :D
The link about Nada's bodybuilding literally had me on the floor.
Your wife, say hi to her for me.
You see, you *want to go home* in this tournament.  You don't want the wooden spoon.  If you win a game you don't advance towards getting the Wooden Spoon.
check this one instead so you dont have it broken up over 3 youtube vids.  [here](http://soundcloud.com/bassnectar/bassnectar-color-storm)
quadrupled 
As I understand it, Ireon85 is not making the claim that 'just play' is fine, or that it's comparable to going out of one's comfort zone. He's pointing out that 'play' has been sold short: it may not be equivalent or comparable to conscious effort, but it's not useless either.
I keep the main number for the cops on speed dial, and call this shit in every single time I see it.  Takin' it to the man!  (Or at least, the idiots.)
Well there's a story Fox News won't be covering.
God of Gamblers. It's an old Hong Kong movie.  That guy is a god of gamblers but he gets amnesia and hilarity ensues.  It's a pretty famous movie.
Who is gonna suck dick when there are feet to be licked?
Not in a text message, actually. I've only seen it on the internet.
Lackey's bWAR this season was -1.2... so... maybe all but a few million, if the team is willing to take on a reclamation project.
Agreed. But many questions i hear asked make me thankful to be such a skilled googler. 
Unshowered vagina, for sure. I've almost gotten sick to my stomach a few times while munchin' the carpet.
boondocks
Anderson Cooper's dark side, you don't want to meet him.
Oy. This is really not that complicated. I'm saying I should be allowed to make fun of conspiracy theorists even if they don't literally make up 50% of a subreddit. Even if only 20% are conspiracy theorists, that's a lot of conspiracy theorists. 
Today you should treat yourself to some Maps by Yeah Yeah Yeahs
If my dad picked the car i wouldn't drive it. He has two cars, an Impala staff car and a 69 camero. I know. Fucking crazy. But as far as a car for his daughter goes, it is going to be the safest and ugliest thing on the street. I'm gonna be picky for my first car, and I know it sounds snobby but if its gonna last through the next 5 to 10 years, I think I get to be. 
How people can be so freaked out over something so fake is beyond me...
Nope. Sorry.
Wow. Upvote for the captions alone! I love all the backstory you included, making it feel like a truly magical and real place.
&gt;I'll be you know as well as I do, there's a fuzzy legal line between full rights for US citizens and rights for a guy who was born here, left young and became a leader for a group hell bent on killing as many Americans as possible.  Not until today there wasn't.   &gt;He hid in a foreign land and couldn't be served with a subpoena for starters. So he got served with a missile. Problem solved.  If you like pissing on the Constitution it most certainly is. If not, not so much. Again, trial in absentia would have been just fine. Please tell me why you think such a trial wasn't necessary and proper. 
Must be good to be a duke, and legally grow your own pot and opium poppies...
girls  cute girls  cute girls with pretty hair  pretty hair  hair styling tips  how to become a hair stylist
hitting women is never funny.  who am i kidding it is totally hillarious!
Oh it's not an issue...whoever wins, I just send them a PM with the coupon info in it, and you can retrieve it whenever you want.   I'm just about to cut up the names and choose one.
Scumbag flatmates, walk into my room, don't realise I'm busy doing 'work'. 
Statistically speaking, you're never more than 6 feet from a spider at any time....excuse me for a minute, I just witnessed one of the little devils crawl into the bathroom. Now where did I put that gasoline...
Every one of their songs has a ton of math involved when you get down to it haha
lol
that is a truly terrifying position you hold.  may you never be considered an enemy of the state.
As a rat owner, I wouldn't deem this as strange behavior coming from, say, two *male* rats. Females generally get along.
Every time I see that meme pic I can't help picture the front page of some cheesy romantic dime-a-dozen novel. 
I blame Alexis Ohanian’s sexy Eastern European girl name.
Someone tweet 'hell yes' for me
What happened to our intellectual discussion? I've given plenty of reasons of why I support my decision. I've responded directly to your points and provided counter points. Why are you blaming my ego? Can I not just have a different opinion?  I'm not trying to change the world, I simply came for discuss and to share my thoughts.
He wouldn't do that shit in the US. Too many of us have guns in our cars...
aww he/she is a cutie.
Fuck Sears.
Well, you can't *see* it anymore can you? Out of sight out of mind. 
[You're welcome](http://tinyurl.com/3khjsqm)
Neither do the ivies (at least as far as I know, maybe 1 or 2 do.)  This is because all scholarships are need based. These schools don't need to bribe kids to attract top talent, so they offer "need blind" admission, and then just pay for you to go if you can't afford it. I went to an ivy where ~half of students received some financial aid and ~25% had a full ride, which includes a couple thousand dollar stipend for books + travel.  No academic merit scholarships=/=no financial aid. It means aid is based on need, not test scores.
/r/RandomActsOfCourtship
Frankfurt, Germany. This next photo I uploaded was a personal photo of mine :)
Search Angela Marquardt. My profile picture is a squirrel.
People in Texas don't call it pop, but walmart sells Faygo.
"Fuck me."
"How do I know your going to say yes? Lol"  /facepalm
I think he owes the science dept. $45...
You say that like the Cartel had a better chemist than Gale at their disposal?  Remember; Gus has been involved in Meth production far longer than the Cartel, has paid for two chemists top-tier free runs through Universities, and has a lab that is far cleaner, more well hidden, and better maintained than what the Cartel was working out of.   From every angle we are assured that even though the Cartel may be larger and more intimidating as a whole, Gus knows how to fight properly as the little guy, and in this case, it's offering product superior to anything they can come up with on their own, despite all their efforts leading up to Gus' eventual ultimatum.   Until Walt came along, Gale was the best, and it's likely the exact same scenario would have played out after his "hard-earned" concoction started taking over the market, albeit with our vegan friend surrounded by Cartelians, rather than Jesse.   Tl:dr; Jesse knows that 96% is good, because it's the second best that anyone is going to get 
I worked for a while in the wedding industry and I planned my own wedding, although in the US.  The easiest way to cut costs on a wedding is to invite fewer people.  That's the most drama-filled way, too, because you have to decide who makes the cut, but if you're serious about cutting costs, that's the way to go.  My second biggest suggestion is: pretend this is not a wedding you're planning.  Pretend this is a very nice party you're having for some of your closest friends/family.  I say this for several reasons- one is because everything wedding-related is more expensive than the non-wedding-equivalent, and the other is that it will help you get out of the mind-set of "It won't be a wedding without X", where X is anything besides your fiance and an officiant.  When you get out of the wedding mindset, you'll find that dresses and cakes are cheaper, you don't have to buy everything in theme colors, and perfectly nice bouquets of flowers are available inexpensively at the grocery store.
Hope he plays out the season - he could use the time and reps. 
If current events are any indication, life will simply continue around the unwashed hippies. Meanwhile, nobody pays any attention, and all their debts get daily interest added.
Oh. JCreator is bugging out anyway. We've been using NetBeans for a while. I have eclipse on my Mac I just never used it
&gt;The idea is that we can imagine it to have gone differently  I'm not completely sure if we're talking about the same thing.  I'm not talking about the *configuration* of the universe.  That is clearly able to be imagined to have been different, no contest there.  I'm talking about the energy/matter (whatever is the most accurate way of describing what the physical world is made of) that everything is at the bottom-most level.  I'm talking about what is *being* configured in our universe, not the configuration itself. So back to what I said above, if we're talking about the existence of this physical 'stuff', to imagine it differently would be to imagine nothingness.  A point has to be something, or else it wouldn't be a point, so I would still argue that we probably can't imagine nothingness.  Pointing out that the stuff can be warped only serves to point out again that the stuff can be configured differently.  &gt;You can, but just know that you are then committing to an extraordinary claim. That there is just one brute contingency, despite all our experience to the contrary.  No, see this is the important piece, with what I'm talking about *everything* is a brute fact of a sort.  That is, to the extent that all of it is made out of the brute fact stuff, it all exists as a brute fact.  Now of course, the objects you're thinking of are specific configurations of the stuff, and these configurations are not necessary in the slightest, but that doesn't get at the underlying issue at all.  For an analogy, I'm basically talking about a lump of clay having a brute fact existence.  Now, you can come along and roll it in your hands and make a snake, you can form it into bricks and build a little house with it, you can even make a little person with it.  After making all those things though, have you done anything to demonstrate that the clay is somehow just as contingent as the configurations you were able to produce with it?
I think it would work streaming online. The demographic you would be trying to hit is online. I don't think it would work well on television, at least in the US.
I  like the Modest Pile with my Professor Specs. If only I had a corduroy jacket with elbow pads.
I would of died happy if it have done the whole thing.
trepanning is completely discredited.  apparently the mistake is to confuse a rush of blood to the head with an increase in intelligence.  to other people, please downvote this to make sure nobody gets any dumb ideas.  intra-cranial bleeding will likely kill you, and no competent doctor will perform this 'operation'.
You forgot the best part, there are no dinosaur fossils put in the earth by the devil to make us question the creator. Redstone use however is banned!
Yeah, that's not how show business works, so no.
I wish more atheists could see that it's this and not a complete lack of intelligence or education.
the problem with the dutch's system is that it still isn't legal to fully grow and sell marijuana to the stores.   what would actually benefit would be legallizing the hemp plant completely so there could be an economic boost along with the sale of the smokeable cannibis. gotta capitalize in every way possible, especially in this economy. 
Choking hazard.
It is god-awful schlock. But if you take every single film that was ever made, and average them out, then shit like that falls into the middle. Are you inferring that I have no idea what quality is? Are you honestly of the opinion that no video games have good stories?
SO FUCKING RELEVANT.
Fuck 'em. They'll come around eventually or they'll find themselves on the wrong side of history.
Where I live we have a lot of exits on the left. Following the drive right pass left rule would lead to a lot of accidents from people trying to cross 3 lanes to exit.
Where did you get him? Do you have a wildlife rehab license? 
b4nny used to be a regular on the TF2newbs.com #7 server, but I haven't seen him around in a month or two. I don't know him personally, maybe someone else there does.  He didn't exactly strike me as softspoken, most of my memories of him involved him singing over the mic, or shouting "Are you fucking me?"
I'll take the former, thank you very much!
I hear you with the between inning stuff.  Saw the Lexus drive around the field and just thought of the poor grass.
I knew it was lame.    When I wrote it I laughed.   It's now not the same.   My pride is now gaffed.   =(
I always kind of saw Mortal Kombat as a B-movie in video game form, anyway. The cheesiness is part of why I love the series, tbh.
this website advocates "paleoconservatism" as a viewpoint.  i can only conclude this to mean prehistoric conservatism, which might mean they are scared of fire and mastodons.  i, for one, support mastodons and fire. 
I know it's only 21 comments in but I think it's safe to say that these are some of the worst ideas I have ever had to try and erase from my brain. Unfortunately, I can't stop thinking about every drunk memory I have and how it would be cooler if I was also throwing javelins. 
Oh hell no. Please don't tell anyone that. This is how caches end up in bad places like private property and people get shot or have the cops/bomb squad called on them.
Just sold it, sorry :[
I am going to quit reddit. This is getting boring.
Discussion never harms anyone. Oogling over pictures of teens doesn't hurt anyone either. Raping a child is different. Same thing about wife beating. Actually beating a wife is different than discussing it. It is important we allow open discussion of anything, because in society people's majority of interpretation of things changes. 
Some even say that's the best part of the game!
His over use of emoticons is disgusting.
&gt; BC Place is, AFAIK, the only NA stadium in the game.  Estadio Azteca is in the game as well.
Inigo
Oh there have been 52 posts.  Me, him and 2 others.
That the military industrial complex is not part of our government.
How long did this take?  I know it was obviously done in sessions, but even just doing some drilling, stopping, wiping it off, and waiting for the picture had to take forever.
They didn't just do it once.  * [BofA forecloses couple who never had a BofA mortgage - the story you're talking about](http://www.tampabay.com/news/business/realestate/bank-of-america-forecloses-on-house-that-couple-had-paid-cash-for/1072632) * [BofA tells woman to skip payments, then forecloses on her](http://consumerist.com/2011/06/homeowner-says-bank-of-america-foreclosed-on-her-after-advising-her-to-miss-payments.html) * [BofA threatens foreclosure for non-payment even though homeowner can prove he paid on time](http://www.nj.com/business/index.ssf/2011/08/homeowner_says_bank_of_america.html) * [BofA forecloses on, and sells at auction, house with mortgage in good standing](http://www.myfoxatlanta.com/dpp/news/metro-family-nearly-loses-home-in-error-040810) * [BofA forecloses on man who paid for house with cash](http://www.sacbee.com/2011/07/01/3740515/wrongful-home-foreclosures-rare.html) * [BofA tries to foreclose on couple with current mortgage](http://www.9news.com/news/story.aspx?storyid=150491&amp;catid=339) * [BofA successfully forecloses on man who never had mortgage](http://articles.sun-sentinel.com/2010-09-23/business/fl-wrongful-foreclosure-0922-20100921_1_foreclosure-defense-attorney-foreclosure-case-jumana-bauwens) * [BofA locks doors, shuts off utilities on woman whose mortgage is current](http://www.post-gazette.com/pg/10068/1041290-54.stm#ixzz0hhcu41ko) * [BofA padlocks retiree's house, throws away all his possessions, never to be seen again](http://www.tampabay.com/news/courts/civil/tampa-retiree-says-he-lost-belongings-in-foreclosure-blunder/1177248) * [BofA buys your mortgage, screws up your account, threatens foreclosure](http://consumerist.com/2010/02/thanks-to-bank-of-americas-crappy-online-payment-system-your-house-is-getting-foreclosed.html) * [BofA unlawfully seizes vacation home, disconnects power leaving 75lbs of frozen fish to rot inside](http://galvestondailynews.com/story.lasso?ewcd=4e1cfb1bebbf31e1)  As if the situations here weren't bad enough already, if you click through the links you'll see that nearly all of these people struggled to get BofA to own up to their mistakes, often needing lawyers, courts, and the local media to get involved.  I think this is a good reason why *every single one* of their customers should leave.  The scary part is that you don't even need to be a BofA customer for them to foreclose on your home, but at least you can lessen the chances.  Personally, I will never give BofA a single penny.  I won't bank with them, I won't take a loan from them, I won't even use their ATMs.  They have shown themselves to be so thoroughly irresponsible that they should not, and cannot, be trusted.
True but irrelevant since roughly 90% of people commute by car rather than bus.
Read this in the voice of Lewis Black.
damn   why didnt i think of that...
I'll be downtown, but working a block away.  If I get a break I'll check it out... 
This is actually the main reason I want to get LASIK done.
It was the British Mandate of Palestine. It's a bit of a different story than most former colonies because of what happened in 1947.  During WW1, the Ottoman Empire occupied and controlled the area now known as Israel. After the breakup of the empire following the Allied victory, the League of Nations gave control of this area to the UK. This transferal of control is called a 'mandate', and it was left this way until Israel appeared and fought for control of the area under the financial and logistical support of the victors of the recently won WW1.  Really what happened is that the European victors felt horrible about what happened to the Jews and those in power began to support Zionism, or the belief that the Jewish people deserve their own homeland. So they decided that the best place for them to go would be the birthplace of Judaism. They fought a quick war and set themselves up. It's a shitty situation for the Palestinians, but you have to remember that this is how most borders are formed: people fight wars and the victors write the borders. Need I remind you about the American Indian? Didn't we do the same exact thing to the native people of America? Aboriginals ring a bell? This is what happens in history... The strong survive. As an Arab-American I really want to say that the Palestinians deserve their own homeland but honestly the only thing I can see them doing is fighting a war for independence. That is happening right now, but its been happening for so long that the Israelis are far far stronger militarily thanks to Allied (now US) aid. Also, both sides are xenophobic to the point where I think all they want is utter distruction of each other.   It's really a tragic situation but I'm not sure a two state solution will ever work. With all of the countries that surround Israel being as xenophobic as Hamas, I really don't think Jews and Arabs can coexist in that region as long as their respective religions are fueling the xenophobia. Maybe the internet will help change the younger generation and they will find a peaceful solution...   What really gets tricky when you say "there was no recognized country" is that we need to use better terminology. For all intents and purposes, the Nation of Palestine has existed for over 2,000 years. The nation-state "British Mandate of Palestine" existed for a brief 30 years or so. What I am trying to hammer home is that "country" is a poor term to use when we are discussing the Palestinian situation.   Consider for a second that a nation is just a group of people (IE: Red Sox nation, nation of Islam), and a state is a soverign "country" that has a government. The term "country" is poor to use because it can be used to describe a state, a nation, or a nation-state.   So to be clear, there WAS and IS a country called Palestine. There was a state in that area (the Mandate), and there most certainly is a nation of Palestinians. 
Their stock went down though.
Do you have access to the packet tracer labs given by cisco? I'm on my second year of the CCNA program in high school. We have online chapters to read which included labs that we have to complete. Basically they're tutorials on packets tracer.
&gt;So, if you are now defining regulations as government support,  Not at all.  I'm talking about specific regulations that specifically prop up an individual or even an entire industry.  Pretty much all regulations do that, but at least some regulations are meant to be universal standards in theory. &gt;If anything, CA and NY have a more robust market than TX  I'm not sure how you are defining "robust" here.  &gt;So, again, a less regulated market has more of a monopoly than a regulated market, but shouldn't the difference be huge because CA and NY are so heavily regulated?  Not necessarily.  Texas is a heavily regulated state too.  There is no "unregulated" market for health care anywhere in this country.  Less regulation does not equal an absence of regulation.  I don't think that you can measure regulations in the number of pages or rules.  It is the totality of the affect of each regulation that is important.  I can't even imagine how you could argue that one market is 70% as regulated as another market.   Besides, market concentration isn't the ideal measure of a monopoly.  A monopoly is an entity that can charge monopoly prices for a long period of time.  Certainly some players will have a large share of the market, but as long as they are not charging monopoly prices, that isn't terribly relevant. The fact that you are bringing up one of the most regulated industries in this country to discuss deregulation is shocking.  &gt; Again, you will say this is not a true free market, and any comparisons are invalid because of government involvement.  It depends on what specifically the government is doing.  There is no key number of regulations, and it is impossible to measure regulations in any amount other than pages, and that doesn't really tell you much about the regulations themselves. &gt;As a counter example, you will provide nothing, assert your position again, and say that you don't have to provide a counter example or counter evidence. See you in a couple hours.  But you don't have any argument except, "there has never been a truly free society," which wasn't what I asked.  Even in an unfree society, you could still theoretically find an example of a natural monopoly occurring without government interference, especially if the market naturally trended towards monopoly as you argue.  
Why on **earth** would want an SUV for your first car?? Give it some time before you become a soccer-mom! With the high price of fuel you really should look into a smaller something. Acura/Honda make great small cars (Civic, Accord) as do Toyota and Nissan. All of these makes are bullet-proof and if something does break, parts are generally cheap and easy to have repaired.
I love how he moved his eyebrows like "I know where this is going" lol
I'm in.. but how will you know whether it's someone's first play or not?
People thought these things were an alien living in the sewers. derp.
Similar sameness with this comment. Actually, this one genuinely deserves your downvote. I mean, "Similar sameness?" That's pretty weak fucking sauce. Actually, so is referring to something as "weak sauce." Fuck, I'm even gonna downvote this one. 
Of course the article is over the top. It's the Examiner. Anyone can write for them and get paid, all that matters is word count, not content.
1) Atheism is not organized.  Are there atheists who get together?  Yes.  Does that make them analogous to religion?  No.  By that logic, any organization would be a religion.  NRA, religion.  EU, religion. 2) The a in atheism doesn't mean anti, it means absence of.  Atheism is not anti-faith or anti-religion, just like agnostic is not anti-knowledge.  3) Atheism does not worship science.  Most atheists understand science.  And the ones that don't, understand that people smarter than them do.  Big difference.  4) Atheism does not see nature as god.  That's Wicca.  5) People do not worship Richard Dawkins (well, there's probably some crazies out there).  There is a difference between messiah and famous person, otherwise, I guess all those famous Islamic scholars are messiahs since you follow their teachings.  6) Morals are relative to each person.  Most people raised a certain way retain the morals of their upbringing.  Since a lot of atheists are raised religious, the lessons of their childhood stays with them.  The difference is, the majority of atheists will question them, and if necessary, change them.  7) I have never turned to a book to justify my beliefs.  Most atheists don't.  Most will lay out why they believe what they believe.   A book may be referenced, but it is not holy in any way, shape, or form.   8)  There is no "right path".  Every takes there own path.   9)  What is wrong with quotes?  If someone else said something better than I could say it, I'll quote them.  Does that mean I worship them?  No.  It means I respect them and agree with their statements.  10)  Most atheists do not "try to convert others".  Most atheists try to explain to you how things works as shown through experimentation or logic without the use of some fantasy.  This is not a belief system.  This is the real world.  11)  Yeah, you missed a lot.
I have more issues with Calvinism than I have with Hell, probably.  But I guess there are good people in all schools of thought, what does that mean for us though?
Seriously, if my kid was talking like that to people shit would go down.  Either I teach my kids how to be a good person or the world will.  I rather do it myself. 
You'll know more about the entire situation than me, so don't take my word as final, but from what you've given me, you have no reason to trust and respect her and it sounds like she feels the same way about you.  If you know things differently then my input might be warped but if what you say is close to the truth then the basis of this relationship is exclusively sexual from the start, and has only got worse since.  I wouldn't put yourself down and say ending it would be "manning up", seeing as there is so little trust and respect, it's just that this relationship is not founded on anything solid and the sole reason for starting the relationship has gone now.  From what I know, there is nothing left for either of you so don't waste your time pretending that there is. You (forget her feelings, she's treated yours very badly), in my view, should feel as if a weight has been lifted; you're young, you shouldn't burden yourself with relationships that mean nothing.  My apologies, I've been out on the town tonight so it's more than likely that my summary is 10x more wordy than it could be.
sir or madam, I am far too high right now for discussions.
Gotta balance the noob friendliness. That way new people can pick it up, but veterans won't be constantly rolling their eyes hearing why colossus don't like vikings all the time. We'll need the John Madden of Starcraft.
I can only hope and pray to god that he was doing it for a type of comedic effect.
NO DAD PLEASE STOP
Scary..
I say the same thing.
Personally, I've been looking for these for a while now.  Pretty much to be badass like Gouki (Akuma) from street fighter.
If that's what you want, then go for it. Just remember that a tattoo is forever; It's very hard to get rid of one without leaving a significant scar. Also, *please* put it in a concealable location, you don't wat to be refused jobs and things in the future on the grounds of a tattoo you got, especially a pony tattoo.
I'm game c: [*puts hands up*](http://i53.tinypic.com/2q2h3rc.jpg)  Also, [yay webcams!](http://i52.tinypic.com/2q8pkxj.jpg)
And the reddit circlejerk continues. It's not hidden when there is a step by step photo set showing where it is.
And here I thought I was the only doctor who despised big pharmacy.
Personally, I pray that he does find [r/Cooperjailbait](http://www.reddit.com/r/Cooperjailbait/).
Bunch of nazis
Yeah. It's getting really choppy, particularly when stuff is happening (in games like prop hunt, where there's little going on, I can run semi-decently - in games where there's more than two people shooting in one area, I'm a fish out of water).  The only thing I changed about any of my computers during that time was setting up the PC.  So I don't really know what happened. It's possible there was a STEAM update around that time, but I can't recall.
I will say conversely that I get frustrated when my loud opposition to fundamentalism is seen as me treating all religion *as* fundamentalism.  It seems to come up often.
What are the lyrics about?
If you're waiting for gingerbread, stop. I know you might not like this suggestion but you should seriously root and install a ROM like MIUI. It's gorgeous, stable, literally twice as fast and nearly doubled my battery life. In addition, there are a ton of other benefits like wifi tether, wireless ftp, themes, better settings menus, and new shade. I switched about two months ago and I couldn't imagine using stock again. If you're interested I would check out miui.us or send me a message and I'll hook you up with more info. 
I'll be screaming and yelling the entire time. Go next door, get job.  This has happened twice now.
Even more people pirated it.
Who the hell would've known to look under that brick if they hadn't seen the post?  Had those bricks stayed in their place for 100 yrs, no one wouldve found it. I dont see many people pulling up bricks from walkways just for the shit of it.  A redditor is the only person who wouldve found it :/
God dammit man! Now I feel all happy. I hate you.
Now THIS is why you gotta support small businesses
Arrrr matey! :-)
In Oblivion, the modding community fixed that, sorta, by creating a lit torch item that you could drop which replaced the ID for the torch you were carrying, so when it was dropped it was lit.  Then they made a hotkey for it... and I think later someone actually made a timer on it.
no hablo espanol
Oblate. They are typically found in slide projectors...if that helps.  :)
Fuck that place...
It would have never occurred to me to do this. Just when you think you've seen every horrible thing, you're surprised at the level of evil that's in the world. We've all heard of the razor blade in Halloween candy scare, but somehow I find this even worse.
...well at least now i know exactly how many hojillions i'm talking about.
It's an intriguing idea and I may try this out. Thank you very much!
I've heard of a few drummers using a 5A in one hand and a 5B in the other.  Try it out and report back to us.
I like that you love something that could easily be a pet peeve.
Raising awareness about the media's foul ways is great and all, but I just don't want to deal with it right now. Reddit knows how Fox works, we don't need more "evidence".   Respectfully/ someone who is tired of the Fox News threads.
Rebloat, unroot, update, reroot, debloat.
Whenever I pick up my brother from Walnut Creek BART I see one of these ads just reminding me I'm not playing starcraft
relax fellow reddit bro, hes not john kerry, lol.
I laughed out loud at this, that's rare.
Hey all - 31 years old, 5'6 and 281 lbs... Hoping to lose 30 by the end of the 90 days. I'm counting calories, signing up for the gym this weekend, and hopefully just keeping steady.  I'm down from my high of 310 since July, so that's good! 
From my experience r/magicTCG has the worst level of downvoting due to disagreement I've ever seen on any subreddit. Even fairly flame-prone places like r/economics and r/worldnews don't get close to that. I don't have any good theory why is it so.
yep, but I reckon that stout takes a bit more barley sugar, which would explain its sweeter taste and significantly greater alcohol content. 
I'm not sure well pro gaming will stack up on espn2. It has always been a haven for physical sports lovers and I can imagine the backlash from die hard viewers that video games are intruding in their entertainment time. I seldom watch espn, and will personally be excited that competitive  video games have garnered mainstream attention, but it just doesn't seem like now is the right time to bring pro gaming to a channel like espn2. As popular starcraft and league of legends may seem, I don't think there is enough of an audience for it. There would probably be similar uproar from espn viewers as when MTV started to show reality tv shows. Esports to us may be deserving of air time, but espn just doesnt feel right. 
Never been charged a fee. They refund ATM fees, and you can make remote (desktop scanner) deposits. They're customer service rocks, too!
Thanks to everyone that linked what I asked for=)
Devin literally did everything on that album. Wrote every note, every lyric, played every instrument, did all the vocals with the exception of some background stuff, mixed everything, did all the production, etc.  The only exception to that is that he doesn't play the drums (ever). They were recorded using the Drumkit from Hell, a piece of software.
&gt; However, there's nothing stopping You from supporting a Real Progressive Democrat  Apart from the fact that none will be running.
That one musta hurt you pretty bad, huh, little man?  Now, go pull on yer little chubby while the grown-ups talk. It's had to have been a hour since yer last tug session, which I gather is quite a break for you.
 Sup, new to reddit here. And danm, I'd love to come but Saturday physics test. Hope y'all'll have a good time together.
I remember one time that my grandad told me a really funny joke. I don't remember any of it but, man, that was a good joke.
and call me crazy, but i think the background color of this comic looks like white.
i'm a girl and i just met a cute random grad student from going to a cultural activity/event thing. just go to any club!
You're welcome. I recommend mining the LOLNFL section of Kissing Suzy Kolber.
Wait, what?  What happened to those Nestle eggs that tasted like crusty ass sweat filled with stupid Disney toys?
God damnit i havent watched those yet
My poly relationship has a kink dynamic as well as a poly one, so it's not a matter of insecurity for us, but a matter of protocol :)
Without any rules it's pretty worthless. 
DMT breakthrough happened.
And a 3-pack of 24 oz. cans is called a Man Pack.
It's hilarious to see someone's politically correct reaction when you show them a picture of Saaya Irie when she's about 15 or 16.  Huge boobs, amazing body.  They tell you how smokin' hot she is.  Then you tell them her age and all of a sudden it's "OH MAN THATS CRAZY SHES CUTE AND ALL BUT TOO YOUNG"  [Example](http://pre-wallpapers.com/displayimage.php?album=8&amp;pos=251)
It's like Tapout for Jebus....  
so much resin
It's not all about what the Constitution explicitly says. The Supreme Court does interpret it. And as far as I know, they have never held that non-citizens in foreign countries are protected from the US government by the constitution.  And granting a power to the President is a little different from restricting various powers. The power to wage war, by its very nature, implies that we are dealing with a territory where there is no US jurisdiction. However, the Bill of Rights prohibits the US government from certain conduct which, in foreign countries, it would presumably not have the power to engage in anyway.
He was replying to the guy above him who implied that zhinto was in charge.
He can wiggle his ear!
Ah thank you.
Less education  Lower quality and less quantity of food  Less access to healthcare
**8=========D**
Book Title Plus 1 Letter:  "The Stairs My Destination" an epic tail of a man who decides to forgo the elevator and walk up to his office.
I think hald takes care of this in Fedora, might be the same in Ubuntu?
&gt;What I read:   A look behind the making of Terry Nova. 
At least it wasn't The Spanish Inquisition.
I'm going to need photographic proof of this.
Never said I don't get hit on. I just said no one asks me out. Guys flirt with me all the time, but I guess they just assume I'm taken or something.
Man...I love NES boxes. They always look awesome.
That's 1.65v RAM. Wouldn't he want 1.5v?
Is there a Winter Wrap Up shirt?
DM;SF  Doesn't matter; still fapped.
Weasleychan. Google it.
This post isn't appropriate for F7U12.
You and can be in ketosis AND still have the keto flu.. Everyone's experience differs based on their previous / current dietary intake and their bodies reaction to the change. Plan for the worst (ie. preventative water/broth, not planning anything strenuous, etc)
Where everything is made up and the points don't matter!
You may also try OptiFine and see if it works! :)  http://www.minecraftforum.net/topic/249637-181-optifine-hd-a-fps-boost-hd-textures/
Frankly, I think more of us could stand to look "gay". Yeah, it's a stereotype, but if "well-dressed" is the gay stereotype, then maybe you should strive for it. When you go clothes shopping, try things on and think "Does this make me look gay?" If so, buy it. If not, keep moving.   Use your prejudice to your advantage.
You sound like a bot. Are all of your responses canned?
A few years? Nah. Several decades though? Despite SPF lotion and clean line work, I still fully anticipate losing some detail when I'm old.
It follows from the view of religion as an economic activity.  Freedom of religion allows religious institutions to vary and compete, so there's something for everybody: incense, gold, oratory, music, silence, pro-slavery, anti-slavery, god of hate, god of forgiveness, ethical culture ... you want, we got.
There's always the vents just watch out for monkey gas.
You obviously don't know what top secret means. He allegedly leaked documents at the "secret" level and below.
Have you seen any WWII movies that portrayed your experience well?
Definitely a real restaurant in Texas -- and he's not a teacher anymore because of the cameras in the locker rooms incident.
I've been optimistic throughout this thread, but your comment made me think that if there's a booth with people who like those goddamned shitty home-made retard comics there, I might drive my car into it.  No offense to any retards who like that shit.
Nailed him. Oh shit, I meant IT, nailed IT!
That's not a trade, that's a dowry.
I upvoted, I'm a terrible person.
Lawyers too I'd bet. And banks...  I like your point.
I feel very strongly about this, and have let my family and girlfriend know this is what I want.   And what the hell would I want Karma for?
Dude, make something up! You only get one chance in college to rock every tail you come across. Make the most of it. I sadly, did not :(
Or else John Goodman will take a crowbar to your neighbor's convertible.
I had my first Nub Cameroon a couple hours ago and your write up definitely mirrors my experience. When I sparked it up the first thing I noticed was how in-your-face the coffee and cedar flavors were. Still new to cigars, and it took me by surprise, but it was great.  I'm going to smoke another with a buddy tonight at a local bar that specializes in craft beer. I'm thinking a pint of Pipeline Porter or Spaten Oktoberfest would compliment this cigar well.
That knowledge is worth much more than $1500, shame on ICMAG.
see sidebar under announcements
Well, I didnt drink, or smoke. But I did everything else wrong. Heating pad on my stomach 24/7 (i have another ailment that that helps with) lots of deli meat, raw hotdogs and kielbasi, scented candles and incense burners, and for long stretches of time had a sever lack of nutrition. Probably what killed her twin when I thought I miscarried and went on with my life. (after being denied entry to the ER, I was uninsured.) Yep. I was skinny as a twig when they told me I was 5 months (still) pregnant. Baby is fine, shes 3 months old now. Tiny, in the 3rd percentile but its family history of small babies. I was so small my mom bought cabbage patch kid clothes. I wouldn't even fit in preemie stuff till I was a month old. Im the biggest on my moms side of the family now. The first half of the pregnancy didnt help her any, but she is growing, and learning just fine. The ONLY thing though was that she was breech, so we scheduled a c-section. She kept twisting and turning and we weren't going to chance a natural birth and her flipping at the last minute.  If they are saying the baby is fine, its is fine.
I AM NOT ALL POLITE CAPS GUY, BUT I WILL EMULATE HIS STYLE. THIS IS BENEFICIAL ADVICE.  THE GIRL YOU ARE DATING IS WILLING TO HURT AN ANIMAL FOR HER CONVENIENCE AND/OR HER AMUSEMENT.  IF SHE IS WILLING TO DO THAT, THEN IT IS ALSO VERY LIKELY SHE CAN HURT YOU FOR THE SAME REASONS. PLEASE ADVISE HER TO GET COUNSELING AND BREAK UP WITH HER IF SHE REFUSES.
You look gorgeous!!! And I'm so proud and impressed and think you're wonderful! I just recently decided to give up my extensions but that's as natural as I'm going to get...I think you're a badass for going all in.
His US shows play him up as an arrogant guy that gets angry as everything, while the original UK shows show him to be more reasonable and using his bluntness as a motivational tool. I didn't like him that much when watching the US version of Kitchen Nightmares, but the UK version (it's on Netflix) made me really respect him.
I think some more traditionally minded women do. Some who prefer traditional female gender roles, for example.
Cool picture
ah. well, still, i'm fairly certain that no beer bottles list the year unless it's considered a vintage. in which case, it'll be prominently displayed.
I still think it causes no harm believing in the picture. Just because you believe in a god does not mean you will oppress people based on that belief. My family is all Christian and none of them will use their religion as a way to limit others rights.  Also, pointing out the flaw in the picture will cause no good. Saying what this picture truly is isn't going to convert anyone instead it will just anger them.   Also it is good to stamp out ignorance, but I only quickly glanced at the other comments on this post and I noticed a lot were incredibly rude. There is always a nice way to go about things. The way the OP did it, which is supported by the number of upvotes he received if you assume the numbers aren't skewed, is not the right way. It only sets to further alienate each other by having to pick a side.
redditors are stupid
I think Kroc might be stoned. AND NOT THE ATLAS KIND. 
GREAT TUNES PLAYING ITS DJ JOEY!!
So you can literally post a picture of anything here with a number in the title and it will get upvotes?
i think there's a ladder at the bottom, i went up it :)
My grandparents live up in BC. Next time I visit them I'll have to check out this spot!
sweet jiminy, I read this as   | my mom who barfs, poops and pees EVERY time she's put in a vehicle Mom, you're taking a cab.
Light melts snow, so you could make the floor out of lightstone or put torches on it.
I am happy with this. The old cyno storm was so cool that the little "plop" animation was a crappy replacement. This is much more appropriate.
TIL: what google is. 
Dude, you are so right. Thank you for the link.   I remember when 10,000 days came out I was really dissapointed. I remember listening to it for a few days, then putting Lateralus and Aenima back in and telling my friends 'The previous two albums have a much more complex sound. Tool has lost it.' And I stopped listening to Tool.  Also, if you actually bought the album, you recall the focus on stereoscopic photographs. There was a whole booklet and a flap with lens in it so you could view the stereoscopic images as a 3D image. So the layering of the songs makes perfect sense with that.  I also remember that Tool was asked if there was a puzzle with this album (like the previous one) and Maynard said yes.  Well. I'm happy to know it's been solved. I wonder what other songs layer - if they do.   Thanks again!
I'm not surprised, especially with it being in the northwest. I am hoping to move to the Seattle area in a couple years for graduate school. I may have to check out Evergreen, haha. It sounds like a very hippie place.
[r/tgirls](http://www.reddit.com/r/tgirls/)
Thanks for the advice! I've cached before with an experienced friend but he'd always be the one to find the cache..
Well, the whole point of The Zeppo is that Buffy episodes are so formulaic that you can infer an entire one just from seeing about 2% of it in the background. So for a new viewer, it would just be incomprehensible and uninteresting.  It's the same problem with leading off with "Band Candy," "Tabulsa Rasa," or "Something Blue." The whole joke there is seeing everyone act out of character. And if you don't have any knowledge of what their normal character is, it's completely lost on you.
I read this as "bartending chip". I was confused.
Have you tried flipping the blade?
Well documented by Jimmy Buffett in 1976 with the verse from "Kick It in Second Wind": Waitresses are pickin' up glasses The bartenders scream last call When I looked to my right I saw a terrible sight As the bass man took a bad fall   
Rylais only gives 15 percent slow, right?
exactly like this http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/kwgsf/i_was_polite_but_you_cant_help_stupid/
why is there lettuce on that?
Did you even read what pendragon wrote? He specifically addressed your point. Like SPECIFICALLY. Why come into a thread just to whine?
If you don't change your underwear everyday, you are fucked up.
well if you do end up in socal, I put in one good vote for [La Habra Pets](http://lhreptilehouse.com/)
Can't say I do.  What made you want to use it like that?
&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
As requested!  Here's one of Mr. "Spawn02000" as posted in the comments below:  http://imgur.com/epndV  Thanks for your encouragement!
me and my friends used to have this 55 gallon fish tank that wee threw our butts into(rolled cigarettes and regular) and when we were low on cash, or tobacco, we'd grab a handful and re-roll some cigarettes.....this went on for about 4 months....here's a picture of my[ smoking side](http://imgur.com/jdaYh).(smoked for ten years, quit a year and some change ago. side  note the orange is because i just ate spaghetti)
Yes, pictures please!
Your title basically says there will be spoilers in this thread. Have at it.
I've always felt like there was a deep significance to the fish in the percolator that I was just missing (feels too random for a Lynch story). Can anyone explain?
I don't know if I go so far as the OP with laying all of the blame of the situation on the stereotypical "horny man" who commits all kinds of evil in the persuit of fucking anything that moves and anything with a vagina is innocent as the fresh-fallen snow. I think that the western "me" culture and the lack of effective parenting in this country lends a lot to the "whorification" of the American teenage girl. It is absolutely correct that no one FORCED these girls to take sexually suggestive pictures of themselves, and they seem to take great pride from a very young age the effect that their bodies have on men of all ages and learn quickly how to use that to their advantage. Looking at the pictures of Angie V that have been posted everywhere... she's 14 years old, is shown in many of her pictures with alcohol, in EXTREMELY suggestive positions and stages of dress. I'm saying there is lots of blame to go around.
Not if this was aired before EVERY MLS GAME.  Seriously, what are they thinking?
I like the idea of trying to be as efficient as possible while masturbating.
$4 for local eggs is prett solid. We pay about $5. They taste like eggs:). You dart to realize how tasteless the factory eggs are. 
Figures.
Runescape red party hat or also known as red Phat.
nobody wants to act like there's either market correction or there's nothing. But as soon as you probably means *you* no
Why are you getting so defensive because you don't think I click enough? Different opinions, Broseidon.
This happened to me but the other way around. I went to the strip club with another girl and a few of the guys from work one night. After about an hour this stripper comes out and she looks like a total tranny. Anyways I lean over and tell my chick friend that this stripper looks like a tranny and the stripper somehow hears me over all the music. She starts freaking out. Grabs one of the guys we are with and starts rubbing her tits all over his face saying "Ahhh I'm gonna make your girlfriend so jealous" Dumbass stripper...wasn't even my boyfriend. Oh and her tits were gross. 
I set different scripts to run depending on the class I'm using.   High sensitivity is super important for Pyro and Spy. I love whipping around corners and backstabbing someone before they can react. 
Beautiful. Inspiring.
Me: "I'm a Computer Science major."  Them: So you work on computers? I don't see the science in that.  Me:"What's your major?"  Them: Political Science. You know that's a real science.
I really couldn't tell you. Its located on San Pedro between Santa Clara and W St. John's if that helps you narrow it down. It also has a large outside patio on the side of it.
It was only found because the guy posted a picture revealing the location.
Anyone else here have trouble sometimes *not* responding to obvious trolls? Dammit.  ...  ...  "knowing"
done!
$20 for a dress shirt is too expensive for you?
Yes.
Yes
*If* this is actually true, you have two choices:  1) Dump her  2) Dump the cat  Okay. You have to pick one. On the one hand, you have an obviously insane woman, a grown adult, who thinks it's okay to throw her boyfriend's cat *in the fucking garbage bin* to try and get rid of it.  On the other hand, cat!  DTMFA. Seriously. Change the locks while she's out and get rid of her now.  That is, if your cat is even still alive when you get home. ' Kick her out, tell her to get therapy and medication, but *kick her out*.
No, I think the U.S. Constitution is supposed to limit the powers of our government, no matter where it is operating.
You give carebears too much credit.
Yes!
At least once a day.  I live in Louisiana and the humidity is so bad that sometimes you need to do a quick change in the middle of the day.
My fiance and I don't smoke pot very often (as in maybe once every year or three) but we had some left over in a baggie that got thrown on a shelf in our room. I realize **after** the in-laws had visited us in our new place that it was still sitting there... months later. Sigh.   I don't think they saw it but it was annoying how blind I was to it.  We're clearly not neat freaks.
&gt;How do you know that?  Or not, as Dennet would say.
Did you end up finding them? If so, can you provide a link?
[Candyland?](http://brighteyeslearning2.tripod.com/sitebuildercontent/sitebuilderpictures/candyland.gif)
I've heard it before used in the first-person present tense, it's possibly a dialect thing?
Carr wouldn't consider it a cop-out, I don't think.   You could also just try using something else (toothpicks, gum, etc.) to quell the oral fixation. 
Have you ever programmed using a magnetic needle young man? Who's following who's plans then?  (I don't actually know what I'm on about, I just want to be funny.)
I'm glad that you're happy now.
&gt; So, would have been a country if not for imperialism.  How so?  If the Europeans never came there, it would still be a part of the Ottoman empire. If the British destroyed the Ottoman empire but didn't acknowledge the right of the Jews to their own country, they would've never set up the mandate of Palestine in the first place, since its only purpose was to create a national home for the Jews.   And even if everything until 1948 was exactly as it was, but the Arabs have won the war, there would *still* be no Palestine, because the plan was to divide the land between Jordan, Syria and Egypt - and indeed, the parts that were conquered by the Arabs in said war were annexed to the Arab countries. In fact, the idea that Palestine is just "southern Syria" or "western Jordan" was the leading ideology well after the war.   The widespread idea that Palestinians should have their own country is a very new concept, even in the Arab world.
don't steal screen caps from xkcd
Looks like time has made it a quiet neighborhood:  [Flickr Set](http://www.flickr.com/photos/burchaski/1952883038/)
I've ruined malls for a lot of people.
I like this! I first saw someone gloving at a show I was recently at. I almost bought a set, but I'll have to do some more research first. Thanks for the link and info!
Weird. Clicking on the thumbnail takes me to the Route 3 video, but the RES button brings up a Zelda medley.
911 where is your emergency 
haha thanks!
Barter.
Why don't you take that shit back to /r/atheism where people actually give a fuck about what religious beliefs people have? 
White or rose. Whatever's cheap haha
Edit to my reply, in case you read it in the 3 minutes before the edit.  I'm not sure what I'm trying to say exactly, it's probably more about me than anything else, but I kind of wonder how you pass the time, if you know what I mean.   I'm pretty much whole, in that I have the appropriate number of functional limbs and so on (that's meant to be funny, if it's not, sorry), and I get as bored as hell sometimes. (Clue, not working right now) I kind of feel ashamed for being so discontent with my life when you're doing so much more in a far more challenging situation.   My question accidentally turned into a monologue, but whatever I might have been trying to say, kudos for being a tough one.
Sorry, had a situation I had to help with.  Anyway, probably a grand or so.  Its not just the money factor, some people would literally be homeless if they tried to protest for a week or so, even a few days could cause a loss of their jobs.   I have been arrested, maced and taken a few lumps from the boys in blue in the past and although they are not my favorite memories I'm not scared to face off again. Hell I even got a Polo and khakis. 
fucking good
Actually, I have a commitment that day. I won't be able to come after all. :(
nvermind, i lived across the street 6674 with the light colored driveway.
Good luck getting a refund and i do agree that the picture does look like gold would be included
I want to upvote but I feel the urge to downvote ;)  Um, Sheila? 
r/politics should have that "It's Dangerous To Go In There Alone!" screenshot from Zelda in the background.
Meh. I like your squished one a bit better. Just sayin..
Conceptually there is nothing wrong with that. Have you used it? It has many flaws that have a fair chance of never being fixed, but it's definitely not worse than BC2.  
How nice, you brought the kitty a present! At least, I hope you did, cuz it's hers now ^^
No. Nullsec
Also, depending on what tournaments you plan on playing, it may not be needed to buy overly priced cards. Just keep in mind that one player that does drop that kind of money on their deck is going to have an out right advantage against players at a FNM event. [Here is the link to my red deck I will be running tonight](http://www.mtgvault.com/ViewDeck.aspx?DeckID=238771) It cost me around $60. Right now that we are in a rotational phase, aggro decks will rule, even weaker ones. After a few months the quality of decks will adjust to the new block.
1.3*million* views so far today **and counting**.
Your sentence "Dry-hopping made a much bigger difference than I had hoped for - it was a very different beer I sampled after secondary fermentation than the one I tried after primary, with many spicy grapefruit- and resin-like overtones in the aroma", isn't terribly clear.  Were you describing the before or after taste there?
I am either going to make the momentum work this way, or else go away from the player to help communicate the force of the impact. Good thinking :)
Because OP is a faggot
WHAT?! That makes too much sense, get off the internet!
It gets even more crowded when you add Spock and lizard.
I'm an ME (BS&amp;MS) working at a machine manufacturing facility.  ME  Pro: Jack of all trades, can do general engineering and go many directions Cons: Jack of all trades, difficult to find a niche that can not be easily replaced by younger cheaper blood.  Real world ME is more like common sense engineering.  (Widget is too big, solution, make it smaller)  EE  Pro: Job field and work is more defined.  More people (management) will not understand a word you say. Cons: You're that nerd in the basement that gets dumped on since you're always the constraint.  Personally I would get into CE/CS (programming in JAVA, Action Script, Etc...) that's really the only innovative place for an engineering in the US economy.  Oracle, Google, Apple, Etc... the money's in software and not hardware.  All the hardware is now made in China and somewhere OTHER than the US.   Since you're in Alaska, you might consider focusing on Energy (Chevron, Exxon, Shell), but there's no innovation in energy.  As an ME/EE you're just another # in the massive energy world.  You'll need a PHD to do anything innovative.  You'll be working for some MBA grad with no science background. 
I'm streaming it off http://www.firstrowsports.tv/ alongside Postseason.tv
Aloe in the Dark The game of an Aloe plant's struggle to survive without sunlight.  It is pretty bad.
Vegetarian to me means not fed other chickens. That's a good thing.
*Irestarter* -- Stephen King novel - about a dude that pisses people off wherever he goes (kinda like glenn beck)
Btw they did ask us to strip down. Very awkward gettin up and seeing a room full of naked men. 
Earth to Rhyme_nocerous, I don't think you get it.
Firstly... what is that?  Secondly, why don't most of you just buy biscuits in packets?
i will check it out next time im in nyc. i live in toronto. 
It is actually quite common, in men. Most guys I know, and myself, experience this on the regular. Drinking alcohol seems to enhance the effect for me.  I do actually have a question as well: does it feel good for you? For us, it feels like a mini-orgasm.
Watermelon is what black people eat
I guess that I don't see that big of an issue with this? I've been depressed and I've been fat, and not always at the same time. Everybody has a choice in the way they treat their own body, and in my personal experience, fat is much easier to get rid of than depression. I was fat because I liked food and didn't like the gym, and when I lost the weight it wasn't because my depression ceased. It was because I started eating right and exercising. 
Nothing goes on downtown.  Get thyself to Midtown, East Atlanta, Virginia Highlands or Little Five Points.  Downtown is dead after 7 pm. Stay away from Buckhead unless you put gel in your hair and enjoy overpriced drinks and fake tans.  For real fun, go to the Clermont Lounge on Ponce de Leon Ave.  Try the ribs at The Local across the street.  They are surprisingly good.
[You got me](http://www.quickmeme.com/meme/354ze8/)
This is awesome. I love reading SCP articles. 
[Better?](http://i.imgur.com/O7lOF.png)
its a comic.
Yes, but in this case those great inventors are giving it to the world, to make everyone equal. He was the oppressor of those with real talents and weight in society. He wanted to make it all equal, instead of only the best of the best naturally.
depends.  is this a two base push on a three base push?  if a two base push, you can mass roach and throw in corruptors if spire tech is available, or roach infestor. if it's a three base push... well... just deny / snipe the third once or twice.  at that point it's basically the 2base push but later, so it's weaker.  edit: if you want game specific advice, I suggest you post replays.  and you might have better luck getting feedback posting in sc2 class / feedback etc (see sidebar for links).
&gt;An empty and meaningless generalization was made.   - Hmm, lets look and see if there was any question posed... "And does money vote, or do people?"   - See, it was right there, the first line. That public education us serving you well. 
My boyfriend and I have been together for four years in November and he has a similar fantasy. We haven't actually done it, yet, but I have had sex with other guys and then told him about it. It can be incredibly arousing. He's had sex with other women and then told me about it too. If I were you I would sit down and ask him what exactly it is about it that he enjoys. If you're not interested in it, tell him so, and tell him why not. If you don't know why yet, think hard about it. This is his fantasy and even if it makes you uncomfortable it's a personal thing and as his partner you should handle it delicately even if you're not going to change your mind. Then see if you can incorporate some of the ideas from his fantasy into the bedroom. Don't go outside of your comfort zone, but see where you guys can take this to create some new intimacy. It may also be a good time to ask him if he'd want to explore some of your fantasies.   Again-- if you don't want to do it, dont. But this is not an uncommon fantasy. Good on him for sharing it, but hopefully he will let the fantasy slide once you tell him you're for sure not interested at all. This isn't really a fantasy you can "dabble in" -- it's a big leap. 
I'm hungry
Please pardon me, but I get a little testy when I see "anti-capitalism" misused. Pure unfettered capitalism is a disaster that will seek profit at the expense of public well being. We have always had rules in our markets in the U.S. to prevent abuses. Things like standard weights and measures so you do truly get a pound of potatoes and a gallon of oil..Regulations to insure pregnant women don't get an anti-nausea drug that gives their babies flippers, etc.  Governments take on the industries that SHOULD NOT be controlled for profit ie. control of roadways and infrastructure for the common good, regulation of drugs and food.   It annoys the crap out of me when someone is called "anti-capitalist" when they want to make a rule to prevent rat turds in food  "OOOOHH!, that's anti-capitalist." It's a "slippery slope" argument that if we do "A" we'll all be plowing the ground with sticks in a collective next year.
I've never felt "sad" about life.  I've felt sad about events and that will always happen.  Part of the secret is to understand that happiness is something comes from what you are, the thoughts inside you, the world you build in your own mind.  If I could tell my 17 YO self anything it would be that most of the things that I felt were so frightening were really not that frightening at all.  Be brave...if something makes your heart pound, and your hands sweat, do it anyway.   The simplest things are important...the girl you are afraid to talk to wants you to talk to her, and she is afraid also.  If you have a choice between collecting things or collecting experiences, collect the experiences, every time.  Go to Australia with a cheap camers instead of buying an expensive camera.  The experiences will bring you more satisfaction as life goes on - the camera will sit on a shelf.  Try to think of yourself as someone who will be a student your entire life...it will help keep you young.  It doesn't seem like much, but these things will help a lot.  If nobody ever gave you the poem "If," by Rudyard Kipling, they should have...so here it is.  Good luck.  Print it out...read it when you are bored.  Over time...you will know exactly what he is saying.  One more thing that I think is important...and others will be angry at me for this but everything I have seen tells me this is true.  Drugs and alcohol will not help.  If you let them become a big part of your life, you will feel the kind of enveloping sadness you want to avoid.  If you have a beer with your buddies, that's one thing...but keep your own mind in control.  That's very important.  Alright...last thought:  The world now seems to feel that snarkiness is necesarry to be considered clever.  Let it go...just let the things that made you happy before, keep making you happy.  That's called avoiding cynicism.  Here's the poem you should already have:  If: By Rudyard Kipling  If you can keep your head when all about you  Are losing theirs and blaming it on you;  If you can trust yourself when all men doubt you,  But make allowance for their doubting too;  If you can wait and not be tired by waiting,  Or, being lied about, don't deal in lies,  Or, being hated, don't give way to hating,  And yet don't look too good, nor talk too wise;   If you can dream - and not make dreams your master;  If you can think - and not make thoughts your aim;  If you can meet with triumph and disaster  And treat those two imposters just the same;  If you can bear to hear the truth you've spoken  Twisted by knaves to make a trap for fools,  Or watch the things you gave your life to broken,  And stoop and build 'em up with wornout tools;   If you can make one heap of all your winnings  And risk it on one turn of pitch-and-toss,  And lose, and start again at your beginnings  And never breath a word about your loss;  If you can force your heart and nerve and sinew  To serve your turn long after they are gone,  And so hold on when there is nothing in you  Except the Will which says to them: "Hold on";   If you can talk with crowds and keep your virtue,  Or walk with kings - nor lose the common touch;  If neither foes nor loving friends can hurt you;  If all men count with you, but none too much;  If you can fill the unforgiving minute  With sixty seconds' worth of distance run -  Yours is the Earth and everything that's in it,  And - which is more - you'll be a Man my son! 
Wouldn't the second panel be, "Fathers' Gay" since it's plural possessive? Or am I just being dumb?
This was my senior quote in high school.
Unless you count confirming to mathematically-influenced music (Bela Bartok, anyone?).
Technically untrue since on the consoles you have the dashboard which is software. On PS3 you are required to install your bought game on to the hard drive. On XBox360 you are sometimes prompted for a required update of game or the dashboard itself.  This means that consoles are not as quick and simple as some want us to believe - however, consoles are normally less of a hassle than personal computers.
Remember when early Homo subsisted on leopards? Me neither. 
Excellent!  Upvote for you!
It is.  See exhibit A: http://imgur.com/aQioL  Then see exhibit B: http://imgur.com/9wLEL
Some say she distrusts the strange brown men outside with loud garden equipment and that she would rather play in a box than with her new toy... all we know is, she's called [The Stig](http://img690.imageshack.us/img690/116/p1100462z.jpg) 
there is no squad management. they should have stuck to the BFBC2 system, but DICE has proven recently that the game might not even be fully ready by launch. 
Oooeee-oooeee-oooeee.  What you see is what you get. Pine Gap handles satellite control and communications and that does not require any vast underground facility.  Data comes into one antenna (in the golf balls) and out another to what ever place the customer wants it sent.
I barely play Starcraft but I love watching the MLG events.  The commentary, as you said, is amazing and gives me a window into what's happening in the game.  Like other sports, however, I have to pick someone to root for in order to really enjoy it.
Yeah the flavors are really hidden.  You almost have to train your palate to pick them out. Now once you have that down go back and try some of your favorites.  You should be able to pick out the more subtle flavors.  
That's a minor heart attack, that's for sure!
fantastic
*¡Que terrible!*
I've sent this to our support team and we will reply back to you as soon as possible.
What was an average day like in his ghetto?   Thank you for doing this IAMA
yeah they had a limited pressing
Rofl, finally free from the grip of TaeJa.
Agreed.
I was just about to suggest this.
~7" long, 6 circ., uncut. Yes, I'm thick. Don't know how accurate the measurements are, [so here's an obviously NSFW picture.](http://i.imgur.com/ulHKK.jpg) Or just look for the links to my Xtube that I post on GW.
The Internet is a public place.  If you put it up on the Internet, no matter how secure you *think* it is, people you didn't intend can and will get to it.  So, either you're okay with the whole Internet seeing it, or you should have never put it online, or let that ex take those pictures, etc...
unsure, but according to [this article](http://www.bizjournals.com/sanfrancisco/news/2011/09/13/wells-fargo-bank-fees-checking-accounts.html), California and Nevada are among them...
32mpg, where's the fuckin gas cap, douche....
OMG HE CALLED HIM A FAGGOT OH NO!!!!! Stop being a little PC prick 
Too bad that EL is a tough sell at 50k.
Allegiance Credit Union and Coppermark bank pay pretty high rates on deposits in the rewards checking accounts.  About 3.1 and 4 APR.  Good option!
If you don't know much, how can you know it is evil? 
**The Tough on Crime game plan**  1. Jail productive, tax paying citizens for trivial non-violent crime  2. Once released, criminal record prevents citizen from getting a well paying job.   3. Price Pardons out of reach of most inmates.   4. Citizens are forced to commit crimes just to survive. 5. Privatize the Prison System. 6. ????   7. Profit!!!
The A5 is a done deal for sure. I just figured that Apple would want to show off high-end games as their principle selling point. But then again, I suppose that Apple knows how to sell devices better than I do.
Colts!
Eat a dick, OP.
Aww I was really looking forward to the album. I hope it's not delayed for too long...this is such a YG move to pull lol.   I'm rather ambivalent about a US release. I doubt they'll have any sort of big success.
&gt;... it appeared to be a campaign that was run by hundreds of Zionist enthusiasts – but if one scratches the surface, it was actually an orchestrated move of barely more than five Jewish bloggers, who have managed to mobilise another twenty or so book burners or shall we call them ‘wandering  sockpuppets’ that habitually attack in different areas of the net and the press, co-coordinating to harass, bully and intimidate, with the same dull, repetitive, accusations, ‘arguments’ and smears.
Otherwise spearmint and peppermint taste great with orange juice.
I hardly play anymore, but I was planning on starting up again. I'm in a long term clan, that has stuck together for years, with hardly anyone left.  My name in the game is [CAI]sir. I mostly played around 2005-2007, but still play occasionally.
I like you. 
In regards to DirectX -- Do game designers design games for Direct X rather than Open GL because it is easier/faster? What is the reason for this?
Your hair looks awesome! I wish I could pull off that look. :P
Rape alarm inspector?
Technically you just asked a young boy on a date. Have a seat over there, man.
Endermen, limited ammo
....maybe....
You completely misunderstand me. What about being nice to people you like, *and* people you don't like? Maybe you consider being nice to be equivalent to flirting, in which case I could see how confusion could turn to anger. If this stems from social anxiety, I've been there for most of my life and understand how painful it is.  Also, if the way you're responding to me is the way you internally respond to people when in person, it's more obvious than you think and pushes people away. Anger gives off a destructive feeling that people often pick up on, but may not consciously recognize. I hope you learn to deal with these problems more constructively, for your own sake :(
Whoever the beautiful woman of color is in your photostream, tell her Jess from the internet said she is a phenomenal woman, phenomenally.
"Working as designed..."
I stand down......
Technically each question fractures my quantum being into two equally frubniferous pieces, leaving me as one of them. I then kill the other one. (If he kills me, then that's fine. I was him anyway.)  Also, I lied in the title, it's actually the observations of the answers to the questions rather than the questions themselves. For a brief period of time I tried asking questions to my alternate self, but this inevitably caused a fractal self-structure to occur, overflowing spacetime with myself. However, as the resulting number of selfs was obviously countably infinite, I killed exactly as many of them as there are, only leaving one left.  I used to date a broodworm. We never could see eye-to-feeler on anything. I'm not racist, but I'd rather not get involved with another broodworm.  Thanks for the great questions! I will consume you.
I was going to say that it is a ridiculous map for zerg to play on, because of all the chokes. I do think it could use some work there.   On the other hand, there are 3 expansions in very close proximity to the main. I think these are far too close together and unimpeded. Zerg could feasibly expand twice and zone control with spine crawlers... which could be imbalanced. But the way the chokes are right now, it would be the only way zerg could win against someone with splash or forcefields.   So, destructible rocks 1 of the 2 third base spots, and thin some of the impassible area from middle. With more room to maneuver it would at least give options for flanks.   And make sure there are no flowers near mains. Or trees. They give away zerg positions &gt;:(
You'll be fine! She's not gunna claw your eyes out I promise!
i also noticed this
Science says: YES.
I assume you asked various dealers to see if anyone has a connect? But I'm in the same bout, no one has any around me. Any experience with acid? I'm not asking you to try to get you into hard drugs, but they're are ways to possible repeat the experience you had
the lord loves a working man, don't trust whitey, see a doctor and get rid of it.
If I had ESPN, yep. And it would stay on, and nobody should ever DARE touch that remote. That remote is mine the entire weekend.
Hell Yes, this is definitely an emergency solution when the hard copy is not available / very expensive.
Yes, but in this case with the local bank it could be similar.
Classic.  Next to the Reggie Bush hit, this one's my favorite.  Besides, of course, any hit laid out by BDawk.  EDIT:  [Another of my favorites from that game](http://www.youtube.com/user/skatebummr?feature=mhee#p/f/66/8edb7b9TMlA)
You're 13.
Nothing wrong with a little ice once in a while. Hardcore scotch drinkers sometimes lose their perspective... think of everyone who is used to drinking their spirits with soda water or worse, soda
Wow this guy is not nice at all. Big fat prick. Hey everybody, this guy is a BIG FAT PHONY!!!!
$320 a week for 4 people. We eat a lot of produce which has become expensive.
I feel for you man. I'm sorry you're going through this.  My wife decided to divorce me in 2009. I'm just now getting to a place where I can think about dating again. She'd gotten pregnant from her new boyfriend and miscarried at least twice by the beginning of 2011.  If you ever need to vent or anything feel free to message me.
All i can think about is goatse when I see this picture
Words have meaning, and you have extracted two words from this passage and applied them to meaning you want them to apply to. That is great. But the passages are clearly talking about having faith in god is great, but you also must must show this faith by doing deeds that prove it if you want to be considered righteous by god. And not, you can pray but then you need to get your ass in the car and go to the hospital. This is obvious by the example they used....Abraham and his deed of being willing to murder his son, and how he is gods little buddy now. 
Daily
lol the movement is still strong
and my bow
Why not take a picture and then help him/her/it?
yeah I found that annoying, almost didn't continue watching.
de nada
Weird, I know three people who have been and they all went by boat.  One was Dr. Matt Kirby, a paleoclimatologist at CSUF.  He's been at least twice and I believe he took a ship from South America somewhere.  The other two were from my current school (which in the interest of anonymity I'd rather not mention as I'm still there as are the people who went), and they went last December I believe.  They also took the boat.  I doubt they would have left from New Zealand though, so maybe that's why they went by boat?  And I'm sure many rescues have been performed, but when it comes down to it, a post stroke observation is not grounds to risk peoples life.  Like many others have said, a post stroke observation is not considered IDLH after 24 hours, and if the victims health isn't rapidly declining, it's not grounds to put other personnel into IDLH circumstances.  Also, as many other people have pointed out, anyone allowed to travel to Antarctica is made WELL aware of the risks, and the protocol for medevac should they become injured.  I really don't see how this thread is even being discussed.  The "victim" appears to be stable, she's not in danger of losing her life as far as qualified medical personnel can tell....why exactly should she be rescued...during winter...in the harshest climate on earth?  I'm sorry, but it's a no brainer from a safety and professional stand point.
 I remember watching this episode as a kid then I just like took a break watching it because of this scariness
Which is exactly what will be happening.
Yeah the steeper price is a common complaint though with the ingredients and labor that goes into each pie it's about the lowest it can be. The australian ginger beer will be brought back! Thanks for the feedback guys!
ha
send the fire department...we got a fatty!
Can you break the pills into fourths and slowly wean off with the rest of what you've got? I am in the process of weaning off Klonopin. I would never go cold turkey. It's very dangerous. 
I work at a finance company and we do have a disproportionate number of good game players (good enough to compete at the regional or national level). The games are chess, go, poker, bridge, backgammon, billiards, Magic: The Gathering, and Starcraft.
Please.  I didn't even watch ESPN when I had pay TV service.
What about the dubstep from 6-7 years ago? The dubstep which is directly influenced by dub and garage?  The thing about electronic music today is that the lines are incredibly blurred between styles, and dubstep is a nice example of this: you have the tunes in the original dubstep style which are based around deep, meditative bassweight and vibe, and then you have the American-style electro-house-influenced, midrange-based tunes. Both go by the name of dubstep, and because it's still a relatively new style (~10 years old) and the fact that only a small proportion of it has been adopted by the mainstream, there hasn't really been any consensus on subgenre labelling beyond 'proper dubstep' and 'brostep'.  I guess what I'm getting at is that music should be defined by what it's influenced by, not by what people call it. Obviously that's not really ever going to happen though.
No, it's not that they are illegal by default until the government regulates them. The government made them illegal.
Why do you care about why he cares about why he cares about what people think?
Exactly my point.  I prefer "it is impossible to predict your reaction" myself, but that's the inner geek talking.  My point is that the entire debate is silly, because it's centered around "what do you mean by free will" more than anything you could answer. There's no debate about anything except "how would we like to define this word?"
Make some green tea. It's not bitter, and you're bound to find a flavor you like. Adding a spot of honey won't kill you, either.
YESSSSSSSS~!!! FOR ESPORTS!!
I'd go fur sure
I do a daily change... more if I've been working out, or just generally sweaty.
Someone forgot to paint that one.
Aaaand bookmark.
Start back up! Join Runkeeper and add me! I recently became an official marathoner and I'm hooked...seems only right I'd get one of my 'internet besties' hooked too ;)  Edit: OMG they're in NYC! I'm joining! Thanks for telling everyone about this.
Back to 1990.
No.
I honestly think that the biggest roadblock in the way of DotA2's success is the community at large. For all of the amazing tutorials, time and effort that the development team could formulate and put forward, the community needs to profoundly change its attitude. There will always be leavers, trolls, and ragers--that's inevitable--but what *does* need to change, imo, is the attitude of "gtfo of *my* DotA, go back to LoL you casual" or just the "we don't want you" attitude period.   League of Legends is, for all of its gameplay faults (which there are many), a very popular game. If DotA2 is to grow as a game, especially if it wants to be bigger than League of Legends or even SC2, people will need to move over from LoL to DotA2--and not just the pros/people with experience, but the people who are willing to sit there and watch matches/tournaments and root for their favorites, hoping to be "the next big thing". We need to be able to sit down and say *why* DotA is better in a reasonable way without needing to put down other games so directly (IE: "DotA has really complex and unique heroes, like invoker" instead of "X game has shitty heroes everything's the same".)
Well, they weren't appointed so much as they were volunteers. The Bene Gesserits were guardians of human history - they used their "other memory" as guidance for their behavior. Leto derailed their attempt to control the fate of mankind, but in reality he saved it by causing such devastation to the known planets that people boarded ships and sailed into the unknown - effectively scattering human DNA through the cosmos. This came back to bite Humans when the Honored Matres returned from the scattering.   But you are correct - Herbert goes to great lengths to explain the dangers in trying to influence something as powerful as genetic destiny. 
feel no need to click on this.... but kind of want to
9, too. Ate 9, too.  It's a secret message.;)
Fucked Up is an amazing band.
She is so beautiful! I love cats with long hair. :)
Looks like the only reason he hasn't been playing that well is the Eagles aren't letting him play in as much press coverage as he'd like.  That's what him so good in the first place.
Celecoxib INN ( /sɛlɨˈkɒksɪb/) is a sulfa non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID) and selective COX-2 inhibitor used in the treatment of osteoarthritis, rheumatoid arthritis, acute pain, painful menstruation and menstrual symptoms, and to reduce numbers of colon and rectum polyps in patients with familial adenomatous polyposis. It is marketed by Pfizer. It is known under the brand name Celebrex or Celebra for arthritis and Onsenal for polyps. Celecoxib is available by prescription in capsule form.
They look so... evil
Dang, I am out of town that weekend.
Naw. I need the reverse. I don't mind reddit at work, its at home I need to fill my time with non-computer stuff.
You really don't need to harp on Muslims as much as you do, looking at your comment history.
That i'm a serious ass person. I've had this problem in the past, people just think i'm angry because of my resting face position. I can't help it :/
I second this. 
I personally find myself to be quite fond of her face.
I am officially fucked up then.
Pretty much 95% or more of people only play a single race. You can actually learn a hell of a lot from playing custom games as they do include ladder maps.
Nice, man! I recently lost ~50 lbs as well with the help of my bike. I opted for a road bike, though :p. Keep it up!
I remember the first time I found out naked girls on the internet. I would googled "Boobies". I got caught, and next I got good at the internet. 
My bike doesn't have a bell but if I have to pass a pedestrian within, say, five feet I give them an "on your left" or whatever. People who don't do *anything*? They're assholes, probably.  Anyway, nice job OP. You seem to have a good support network with your dog and your aunt. I expect some good results from you.
if she wasn't pretty you def should have called the police
So you're a noob and retarted, just like Bush. HAYOOOO 
It's not even about opinions here. It's a fact that you need high APM to play Terran efficiently in Brood War. (Edit: You also need high apm to play the other 2 races at a high level as well)
It all came rushing back like a 'Nam flashback.
Not at Michigan.
no. not it is not. 
biggest fuckin loser ever fuck protesters they get nothing done i hope a cop fuckin pepper sprays you then tases you while beating you with a baton you fuckin whiner 99 percent douchebags you give america a bad name, fuckwad!!!!!!!
You're just making it harder for me to resist playing D3 when it comes out. Curse you.
$100 for two
*bam bam*  You've been hit by *very small pause* a goat criminal.
Um, don't listen to this dude. God works all things for the good of those who love him... trust in his perfect provision and the fact that this time is indeed with purpose. He is building your character. I know that's extremely hard to believe at times... but shower yourself in his word and believe in it.
the article is from the future!
ask for something in return. AHEM AHEM  I mean how else would you stop the tickle monster.
So just HOW hard is it to grow?  Can you describe briefly the growing processes/method involved? Or link to a site that can? I've always wanted to grow salvia, but this kind of discourages me :(
New bassist. More people should know who Justin Chancellor is--he's easily one of the greatest rock bassists of modern times.
I LOVE black pudding! I used to eat it all the time when I was a child. Only my dad and I liked it in our household. 
Awebutt
I respectfully disagree.  She does have a choice about whether to embark on LDR and a life as a military SO.  She could always choose to end the relationship if he can't give her the commitment she needs.  If he can't give her what she wants, she ALWAYS has the option to leave.
THIS.  That damn game is the reason I'm buying my wife a Kindle Fire. Now she can play ~~Shitty Physics~~ Angry Birds until her fingers break.
Yep. I have a credit card through them that I need to pay off and then the card is going in the trash, and the checking account I have will be closed. 
I remember when PC games looked like this.
well im a pats fan so i basically have to start any player going against our defense. 
What is this about? I'm new.
Stop shredding them and there might be more. Er on second thought keep up the good work.
I have a tattoo of a cassette tape, but it's all about context, right? Right...?  *sigh*
You could have just posted in askreddit...  On topic: I sometimes shiver when I pee but not always.  btw. What is your favorite color?
They might care, but caring alone doesn't accomplish anything, and neither is what they are doing.
That's right, you fucks are proud of it.  Don't you see how pointless banning is? Hpfuckface got her way though so yay!
Yes, yes, a thousand times yes!
Only if it's gonna be on "The Ocho"
somebody tell me what happened in that without it taking 9 hours to read or containing any form of "lol" in every sentence.
What's his point?  Believing that time doesn't exist means absolutely nothing.  10 bucks says he's a solipsist.
A 24-36 hour fast periodically (or even as frequent as once or twice a week) is very complimentary to the keto lifestyle.
Geez, is this srsly how kids spell/type these days?
it's not that redditors have accesss to tigers;  it's that people interesting enough to have access to tigers are just the kinds of folks who would feel right at home on reddit :p
Source?
I have twelve chickens.  They aren't completely free range, because I do have them in an enclosed area on my lawn, but the eggs still taste way the hell better than stuff in the grocery store.  I'd venture to say they probably do have better nutrients as well.
So would equally hard barrel/cones be better for both trucks?
I feel the same way about you. Funny how that works.
She only ate or drank things that were just right.  the pun here is too (two) cubed.
Ummm, yeah. Like 4 times.
Hey, Crab Man.
What's wrong with making a student repeat the grade due to lack of understanding the material?
Does the fake one have any "bell clapper" functionality that keeps it from spinning excessively, or is it free floating?  Where and how big is the scar?  Back of the coin purse?
Amazing....JUST AMAZING
ahahahahahahahaha. too many "lolls" tho
House
What is octopus?
what can brown do for you? apparently more than i had in mind
I asked a girl I liked, we'll call her Erin, to accompany me to my company's Christmas party. She already had a date so she introduced me to another girl who secretly had a thing for me, say.. Amanda, so she became my date to the party. Open bar, after party at my house, one thing leads to another and I sleep with Amanda. The next day I receive a phone call from Erin. She was all, "so.. you had a good time last night huh.." I tried to play it cool, as if nothing happened between Amanda and I. Needless to say, my efforts were futile. As it turned out, Amanda was so drunk that she didn't remember having a tampon in. I was so drunk that I didn't notice either. Amanda had called Erin the next morning to ask her for advice on removing a tampon that had been drunkenly smashed up inter her vagina. Erin had no experience in this field therefore no advice to give. Amanda ended up going to the hospital, meanwhile giving Erin the play by play on the whole event.  All this info came out during my conversation with Erin as well as her confirming the fact that any chance I had with her was now eliminated.
Yea operative (Chiwetel Ejiofor) was amazing.   Every good show must have a great villain and he hit it out of the park.
Never seen the goats look so nervous.
That is a REALLY awesome idea, I will think on that.
That’s very different from saying that one who does command the concepts and learned the language of the Piraha couldn’t express mathematical concepts with it.  A gap in the lexicon does not prohibit a language from expressing something.
"No worries."
Not in reality. But it would be funny if it worked that way.
MLG is a blight on competitive gaming. They only get people who are TV pretty and have prize money that comes with many conditions from the corporate overlords. If you want good competitive gaming look at any major fighting game tournament. The people who win do so on merit and the money comes from the community. 
In the States anything that uses air is not considered a firearm and the laws are different.
These protests aren't about Wall St anymore, they are about authorities, and people the country entrusts to serve and protect it's citizens, abusing their power and responsibilities.  Sure, in a crowd of thousands of people there are definitely going to be idiots, and bad apples who riot and fight. However I would never expect behaviour like that from the people who are supposed to oversee a peaceful protests.  I commend every single member of authority who has stood their morale grounds, and stopped their fellow officers from harming innocent people. But let it be known, if you stand by and watch, you are no better. We are fucking humans first, not employees, start acting like it.  America, I wish you good luck in the near future.
Shaun Phillips for sure
That wasn't funny
&gt; In Cartagena Colombia, looking or someone with a boat that wants to travel a bit with me.  Do they have to fight a crocodile for a ruby first?
Okay, maybe, but more than two feet instead of four inches?
Here's how it goes:  Lion King = Hamlet  Lion King 2 = Romeo &amp; Juliet.  Enjoy.
I figured. But I missed out on a chance with this same car a while ago, a lot less miles for that one with the matching higher price tag, and I was really bummed. So I was looking for another chance.
Yeeeep.
I just graduated.  Here are my tips. I have to echo what Rawwh said about the technical writing.  As my profs. would say, leave out all the flowery adjectives and fillers, straight to the point facts and data but not say that it should be dry and boring.  My BS program only required Calc I but if you plan on grad school get good at math.  And Hydrogeology is probably the most match centered elective.  And be prepared to spend long days outside hiking around looking at rocks, my favorite part of the major.
Come to the UK and check into a hospital!
The user interface and lack of "readily" available information is fine, I don't deem that making the game less skillful.  Such as in mana bars, I think hiding elements that are accessible anyway is just a fake layer of difficulty, thats what we need to remove to help new players learn the game faster.
Snot rocket? I've always knew it as a "farmers blow"
Because I would like to visit my parents on a day when I know there's a SC2 game on, and there are no other sports on TV that they want to watch. (I already drop in when there are other games on because I don't have TV service at my house.) I'd turn it on, my Dad would feel left out and would start asking about the rules…
How did it go for you? I got two 560ti's and I am tryign to find out how to do the sli hack...but the site is down &gt;_&lt; i keep getting 404'd :/ any luck good sir?
If only there were other pictures of naked women on the internet for you to gawk at!  Heavy sigh. 
Some variant of "please focus on your work".
I gotta say, I feel bad for people who identify as republican based on the original points of small government and such. It's kind of like the black community. Most of them are normal every people who go to work and take care of their families and don't want to cause any problems, but the people representing them in the media have to screw it all up.   The difference obviously is that you choose to be a republican, and people can't tell based on how you look, but I have a couple of friends that identify as republicans but are super ashamed of what the party has become, and don't want to be associated with it anymore. 
I want to change my bank, though I don't know much about different choices (and people keep saying Credit Union, so I should look into one of those).  For the most part, are most banks/credit unions pretty much the same for keeping a checking and savings account? Anything important I should know?
I'm in this group, for sure.  My own successful and fulfilling business, enough money to live comfortably through retirement, GREAT relationships with my kids and their families, longtime friends with whom I share a history, good health due to informed lifestyle decisions, open-minded enough to consider all sides of political questions and not ignorantly blinded by just one position, tolerance enough for young people to read Reddit but not stupid enough to pay too much attention.   I don't know where you get this "sad" bullshit, but you probably just haven't been exposed to many older people.  Life only gets better -- even when you go through really hard times, you learn and grow from them.  Keep in mind two things as you grow up:  No one ever lay on his/her death bed and wished he/she had worked more; relationships, not money nor success, are what makes life GOOD.  Oh - number three -- there is a GOD and you are loved.  
No worries. You're absolutely right. I should have just linked to it to start with. That's the whole theme of this thread!
No they didn't, one of them did. The other defended it, and Anderson Cooper did not express an opinion either way. Stop victimizing yourself.
AudioEngine A5 for big sound from a $350 package. Its little brother is the A2, which I just bought because the A5 was WAY overkill for my office at work.  Read some reviews, most people are pleasantly surprised, if not blown away, by the sound that you get for the cost.
just use a real doctor, and while you're there, you should prolly get your head checked out - it seems to be growing really fast
bless all forms of intelligence 
Alberdolf Hitlstein.
[The Temple Steam group I'm part of](http://steamcommunity.com/groups/templeu)  [and here's my page](http://steamcommunity.com/id/johnnytaped) The name's Johnny. 
That. Is. Bad. ASS!
It's a good thing I can still operate the shotgun with these hooks they attached to the ends of my arms...
I did maybe 2/12 for a lot of it. I can affirm that CSS is far harder than any console game I've ever played.  TF2 had a tough and long learning curve, but CSS's is probably at least twice as steep.
Still gives me chills...
[Shakespeare would like a word with you...](http://www.nosweatshakespeare.com/resources/shakespeare-words/)
&gt;You do realize China does not have a navy  Missing many recently completed ships and entire littoral combat force, but you get the idea: http://i.imgur.com/q6XiT.jpg
Oh okay. Then I have no idea and wish you the best of luck
I was wondering WTF happened *after* Ænima. Maybe it's just me, but they don't have as many really killer songs per album anymore. They sound like A Perfect Circle now, which is OK but they sound almost neutered now. I am still a fan. I'm not trying to piss any of you off--just wondering if anyone agrees with me.
Knew this a while back. Love them just as much as when I first found them.   I can only imagine how hard this must be to us normal folk. It's hard enough to write a good song with a solid riff and now you throw in restrictions to the number of syllables? Crazy shit.
Oh, so THAT's where children come from.
Fix it yourself.. it's only a small change. (I'd do it for you but I'm off to bed)
Good luck , with the deepest sincerity, good luck and be smart. This could be one of the greatest acts of unification to happen in America in a long time. I will be waiting with high hopes for the story!
And, to top off the "have to carry lots of ammo" part, Hybrid ammo is roughly twice the volume of projectile ammo of the equivalent size.
Nah. Not that it's offensive or anything, it's just not particularly funny.
Helpful
I will post a follow-up, and probably at least a dozen more, in the weeks to come. I have a LOT of stories, each one hotter than the last.
Link's dead
That works. /schlick
Oh, snap. Well, it can only really be noticed by other bronies anyway. Unless she starts covering it with pony stickers.
and blizzard was always so fond of wizards just look at wow.
But one has to wonder: could an Abbath administration withstand the fall of time? When tragedies blow at the horizon, when dark and light don't differ, at the heart of winter: would an Abbath government descend into eminent silence, or could it withstand the years of silent sorrow? While there is no doubt Abbath presents a perfect vision of the rising northland as his candidacy obviously swims against the tide, skeptics may question whether an Abbath triumph would be a sign for the north hordes to ride or instead that the electorate, one by one, cannot shake its fascination with tyrants.
I'm really interested in what his house looks like because I am expecting something like [this](http://2.bp.blogspot.com/_xE581t29CVY/S7YP3GuhhFI/AAAAAAAADOY/K3ImArtkxb8/s1600/BILTMORE.jpg)
I found a shortcut about this. Pick 5 different psychs and meet each of them and make them aware that you are psych-shopping and tell them that it is your first time and it is very confusing, don't know what to look for and what to expect, etc. Then the psychs will really try to sell themselves. Pick the one that speaks less "imaginary bullshit" and actually makes real world sense. Note that even if a psych starts talking about "positive energy", "internal peace" and such bullshit some of them are actually able to explain themselves in a way that makes sense, so any time something doesnt make sense to you ask them what they mean, if it still doesnt make sense it is probably bullshit.
I love being in the kitchen, despite also being a cooking idiot. So, these ingredients are pretty simple.  Low carb tortilla (I use mission)... these small ones are 3g per, bigger ones are 6g per.  Pizza sauce of your choice (or make some)  Shredded cheese  Pepperoni  Spread the sauce on two tortillas (one is too thin/flexible and doesn't have much of a bread taste, but it might work). Spread cheese. Put pepperoni on it. Bake in oven at 350F for ~8-11 minutes, or something. The baking directions will probably be different if you're using larger tortillas.
Have you tried the inverse-root genders? They tend less towards extraneous subjective thermal outputs.
Your primary assertion was false in context.
So what happens when "solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic" conflicts with " I will obey the orders of the President of the United States and the orders of the officers appointed over me, according to regulations and the Uniform Code of Military Justice"?
its a ghast tear
No. 1 Chinese at High and Woodruff.
"I pay your wages, I can do what I want!" he screamed, before spitting in the policeman's face.
well that is an awesome position 
I would probably do black tea with sugar and lemon or green tea with honey.
I'm not buying it, but then again I haven't play any shooters since MW 1.
Some people will like the hair - I mean, it's pretty nice hair for being so long but you have to realize that it is/will seriously hinder your life.  No one, except the weird old guy at the shitty record store,  is going to hire you with that haircut. Most girls are going to instantly dismiss you because of that hair.  Social guidelines SUCK A LOT but you have to abide by some of them if you want to have opportunities and live a decent life.  You seem to be kind of cute, so just lose the hair and please stop dressing like that.  You're only sixteen though, so I guess you can hold onto it for another year if you really want to.
QUIET DOWN OLD MAN. I'M BUSY LISTENING TO MY MUSIC ALL THE WAY UP AND HATING THE WORLD
Dudette. And I'm glad you like it! It's an awesome game and tends to be overlooked by even some hardcore 'gamers'.   Hope you plan on playing ME2 and eventually ME3! Try to get as much as you can done in ME1 before you start the second one though (I.E. play the game more than once and try out different conversation trees/and maybe try a full Paragon or Renagade run, etc)  ME2 will eat your soul.  and stalk the r/masseffect sub. 
Ice cream! To Dan!
I want to live in this world where studios pay bands!
O_o.... i want to go!
I know exactly what you mean. Movies have really been helpful as of late. Probably going to have a few cups of green tea and continue the Star Wars marathon:)
I don't see why not.  I would watch for sure.
what if you have a hobo in an un-airconditioned car?
This is Havasupi Falls, Arizona. I hiked it several times years ago, and it was an incredible experience, I recommend it to anyone who has an opportunity and is in the area!  [Google Images!](http://www.google.com/search?gcx=w&amp;ix=c1&amp;q=havasupai+falls+arizona&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;hl=en&amp;tbm=isch&amp;source=og&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wi&amp;biw=1600&amp;bih=775)
how often do you people get mistakenly texted? I see this all the time on reddit but its never happened to me.
I have fable 3 with DLC card that came with it unused.
I have both Dallas Clark and Fred Davis. I really don't trust them at all, and picked up Randy McMichael (SD replacing Gates) off waivers, and will likely start him this week. 
Oh you!
i will do this next time i go. thanks for the protip!
What are people's thoughts on EK now? Dropped over 50% today to $.78 (after hours at $1.05).  Per their public statement, they have no intention to file for bankruptcy.
Try it.  adwords.google.com.
Tnx, I got some of this,   still i just think what he means by theta is a function and not a (static)parameter?   Anyone else please feel free to expand on the analysis of the example as well as just pointing to a general notation reference.
posting videos of others accomplishments is so much better than posting your own.  he is on reddit also :)
Yeah I'm not totally sold on food reward being as big a factor as stephan suggests, but I'm also not totally sold on dismissing it like Taubes does.  I HIGHLY recommend listening to Episode 30 of "Latest in Paleo", with Taubes as the guest; it's from a couple weeks ago I think and Taubes talks about the incident at AHS and why he disagrees with Guyenet, and also talks about some ideas I've never heard discussed.  I just listened to it on my ride home tonight, I still have like 20 mins left though.
Ugh have to get up at 6AM tomorrow, will probably make it sometime this weekend though
&gt; However, once you exhaust those, that's it.  Then I request you never use Mario Bros. as a point of argument again. Every brick, every goomba, and Bowser are in the exact same spot doing the exact same thing. Yet it is a game still played to this day. It even has a light story around it. Save the Princess. But just as you have brought up before, it is the choices that make the game interesting. And Hitman gives you loads of choices. That is what is important.  And I noticed you didn't argue my first point. That what you're advocating for is one particular game philosophy that you enjoy. Espousing that it is the only/best/true philosophy there is. I'm not saying that it is a bad philosophy either. I love a game with simple mechanics that gets deeper the more you learn about it. Magic: The Gathering is a perfect example of this and I encourage all game designers to look into it. There is a reason why it is still the number one CCG out there.  However, many people don't like it. So they've turned to other card games. The newest version of the Game of Thrones card game is a LCG (Living Card Game). It works a lot like M:TG put removes the aspect of "He who has the money has the best deck." It fundamentally changes the concept of what those types of card games are. Does this make it any less of a strategic card game? No.  If you wish to make simple but fun games with very little story, that is awesome. I imagine I could even enjoy them myself. But saying that games that strive to have story shouldn't be considered games is... Well... Silly.
He doesn't want or need their respect, just their acknowlagement of his higher ability level. Or not even that- this is a troll in response to cod player rage at his instructional video for CSS. Being immature is actually productive in this case.
Grovyle is confused with what is happening, but hey free food. He starts eating the new berries after thanking the sandslash.
Strictly speaking, they're the black mages from Final Fantasy I, III, V, IX, and probably many more - Square/Squeenix really like to revisit that design.
He would obviously become a tyrant that will ride armored horses. His gloves of steel would hold a tight grip on society and his silver blade will cut all those who appose.  I bet he's got the North's vote. Mine included!
That's a cock-pushup right there man
Yes!
Theres only 1 taco bell in Britain as far as I know.
You are right.
First things to upgrade:  Stiffer and lower suspension, wider wheels (NOT CHROME FOR THE LOVE OF ALL THAT IS GOOD), lower profile high quality directional tires, bigger brakes.  Better control, better stopping.  
That's no wall.
I once read on read that using a nail clipper to cut off the ends will allow the quills to essentially fold the barb back in for easy extraction. Since I'm not seeing it here again though I'm guessing it doesn't actually work?
Can someone please explain this to me? I feel so stupid. And also I'm drowning in "loll".
I think your reply pretty much encapsulates everything this one's about. Or was that your intention?
I buy from local farmers (friends of ours, actually) but I feel for those folks who don't live in a place where buying local is easy and convenient. 
ok. interesting. thanks. ; I think the belief that [your thoughts can influence the world remotely via some unseen intelligence] is one of the main points where "believers" diverge from "unbelievers" (to assign clumsy labels). Just about everything else is mostly a difference in language - but it can be hard to argue across that divergence to find real common ground. 
So I guess ∫x^3 + (9-x) isn't an accurate description either?
Hi Mick,   * What one moment in your entertaining career to you think back to mostly? It doesn't necessarily have to be the one you thought "wow" to at the time, or even the scariest moment. But the one that you find your mind wanders back to most regularly.  * Also I'd like to thank you (and your supporting family) for the many years of entertainment you have given myself and the rest of your fans. You have had many great matches, written some really enjoyable books, and I hope that I'll get a chance to see your stand up one day (unfortunately I haven't got tickets to the London show in November).  Thanks again.
Work for a hospital. My favorite was I reset a users password and I told her it's her last name(brown) with a capital B. Instead of putting in Brown she put in brownB. Do now I always say capital B lower case r-o-w-n
I hope they answer soon; I don't want to keep this baby in my freezer for nothing.
Why should 'someone' do it instead of you?
Ironic that you are complaining in this response.
You can dye your armor to different colors with armor dyes.
I don't know what a Dubstep is... or a Weetabix... but that was the most entertaining cereal commercial I've seen in a while.  Okay, that was the only cereal commercial I've seen in a while, but... yeah.
or start prying up the pavers
They still CAN airblast, so that can be dangerous for a soldier.
A subreddit like that for boys exists. Not as many readers, but still as bad.
Try r/gearsofwar, I'm sure someone there can answer your question.
How busy does this place get?  Is there a seating area?
Like a baughss.
Good job?
Nope, actual female here.
'Nuff said.
They still sell at a loss?  You'd think the price of the hardware would've gone down by now.
Its fine they come in a brown box with nothing to get you caught. I just got a 2 ft bong delivered to my dorm with no problems
I could not find any *.ini files in the .minecraft folders and the options.txt does not have any thing regarding folders. I don't feel comfortable messing with the .jar files either =( thanks for trying though
We don't know that everyone dies, though, right? Like, someone could have stumbled out into the ice and potentially been rescued, right?  It seems like there are still ways to have hope that the characters might escape. However, if not, perhaps it will build suspense in different ways than on whether the team will die or not. For example, you know what happened at the end of *Ray*, too.
It's funny.  The question comes to mind, "Would you like a murderer being cheered for throwing a football?  Or a child molester?"  And though I can't see myself cheering a child molester for throwing a football, why is it that some part of me says "Yes, OK.  He may have murdered, but he has atoned for that.  He is changed.  I will readily cheer this man on, not only for the betterment of himself, but for the betterment of us all.  So he's a murderer."  But that's the thing.  Murderers appear to us as only human.  I could be one, given the right (wrong) circumstances.  Murder is an incredibly unfortunate act of impassioned, what, insanity?  It happens.  But throw innocents into the mix, with child killing, or dog killing, and that changes things.  It takes a mere murderer and makes him a monster.  And that is what Vick is.  A taker of innocence. 
You missed the point. I'm talking about what's right and wrong--not what's legal or illegal. 
"she"?
The plot of transformers is a thinly veiled excuse to string two hours of  explosions, attractive women, and other visual stimulation for the enjoyment of the viewer.  A story doesn't need depth to be fun. People react and empathize with basic archetypes, and even the most transparent characters help justify and improve the events happening on screen.  Not every game needs to be a challenge; they just have to offer an experience enjoyable to the consumer-- story in games helps provide this for many gamers.  Some people want to strive for a high score, others want to find the castle with the  princess actually in it. Game companies don't have to cater to only one market.
:D
I have bank of america and wells fargo and I freaking hate both of them.  Wells Fargo charges NSF fees the second the overdraft appears on the account but will reimburse half of it or remove it completely some of the time.  Bank of America gives 24ish hours to cover the overdraft, but refuses to ever remove the NSF fee no matter how much you beg. I only started with bank of america once they started the new ATM's (which everyone has now).  I use Wells Fargo (wachovia) because it is linked to my parent's account in case I need money transferred.
Though theoritically speaking can you have a mac that can run a very graphics-intensive game on a mac?
But he didn't. And they didn't.
If civilization has nothing to fall back on, then it will end up like mad max, fighting over resources we never needed before, until there is nothing else left on the planet. I'm fine with using resources if there is some goal, like getting across the universe to another planet, but making modern life comfortable seems somewhat minuscule.  Do those who profit constantly innovate to free us from their clutches, or the opposite?  
Yes, you are alone.
He's not the Messiah you want him to be.   He is a religious wacko, denies evolution in the face of evidence, is anti-choice, and has only *hinted* that he wouldn't **increase** federal power against marijuana - he has made no commitment to legalizing it.  I'm hoping a better candidate pops up.
Holy shit. Stop saying lol.
Not sure if trolling, or.....  Nevermind. Definitely trolling.
Volpatti wrecked the sharks. And Ballard's hip check to Couture was impressive too.
Juice
Jesus does. Jesus lead me to Talk Talk. 
this [game](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YF9DyCl11XM&amp;oref=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.youtube.com%2Fresults%3Fsearch_query%3Dfeed%26aq%3Df)
Melt it and turn it back into milk. 
Calm down, buddy.  The link you provided only cites trivial inconsistencies.  Hyperbole and anger don't improve political discussions, they inhibit them.
"One does not simply walk into Mordor."
Your hair is ridiculously cool.
First of all the original creditor probably has already reported you as having bad debt, so whatever the collections agency does is probably not going to matter because the original creditor is never going to unreport it.   Second, having a little thing like that on your credit report, especially if the debt is funny money like much of the collection industries debt is, is not going to be a big deal if you have generally good credit.   In the past year I've had a couple of collection agencies try to get me to pay them money.   I completely ignore them and still have good enough credit that I am constantly bombarded (2-3 times a week) with credit card offers in the mail.  You have to do whatever you feel is best for you.   But your case is a perfect example of funny money debt that the collections industry thrives on -- a debt that would never have existed in the first place (nobody would pay it so the bank would have dropped it) without the existence of the debt collections industry.  The collections industry is more of an extortion racket than a legitimate business.
O god that hurts.
You. You sir. You are a saint. You took an opportunity to help a random dude get a date and RAN with it.  Although I am troubled by your uncanny ability to impersonate a high school girl.
So let me give you some inside about why they suddenly started doing this.  The usual way that debit and credit card industry work is that for each transaction they charge merchants a fee called interchange. this is the fee that pays for the cost of the network and profit for the bank and all the parties involved (e.g. masterard, visa and other processors). And remember operating this networks is very expensive usually each transactions goes through three different companies and networks until it settles, add this to the cost of frauds and R&amp;D. Sometimes ago big retailers (like Walmart) went to the government and complained about these fees. Lots of lobbyist from both side (merchants and banks and networks) worked on this. Story short retailers won. And government regulate the interchange to specific fee( I cannot remember it) and there is a deadline for the banks to implement this new fee. Banks and network companies hate this because that means they have to pass the cost to consumers and they can loose transactions and potentially customers. I assume that is why BofA and others are starting to charge fees. However, I am not really in the position to say if this fee is fair or not, and I am not here to defend them. I am just giving you information.   In short: Government regulated debit interchange fees, they are passing the difference to the consumer. 
What about something related to this? http://imgur.com/Yux1i
Anyone who takes this my game vs. your game shit seriously is ether 14 or has a huge gaping hole in their life and a need to feel better than someone at something, no matter how ridiculous.
Lame.  *hugs*  (I had one girl respond 1 month and 4 days later.  It is best to move on, but, shit can come up and it can be hilarious when people do finally get back to you.)
Idk, it's pretty shitty, but I like their customer service, and i also like how I can deposit checks in their atms any time of the day.
you accidentally your links.
If someone posts a video in which someone pulls this defense in an actual game of Brawl I will give you a shiny new upvote!
Youtube: 1593 comments in 20 minutes.  Reddit: 2 comments in 2 hours.  wtf
This is how I've been doing it for years.  The only issues I ever have is with 64 and 32 bit drivers.  
Never confuse education with intelligence.
Lol.  True, but I'm sure that there will be some private roads that may require you own insurance, and the insurance company may require that you submit to some sort of inspection.  There are plenty of people who would take a chance driving an unsafe vehicle if they "felt" they could get away with it. I just don't think that state vehicle inspections are really what should bother libertarians.  There will be red tape in a free society too.  But at least the creators of red tape will have to answer to customers, instead of nobody.  
I can confirm that Sherpers in Hales Corners has a lot of flags.  Milwaukee flags, not sure.
Nice shots!
long live non apple people
Looking forward to them finally releasing the unrated version of that on blu-ray.
Why can they build an algorithm to do it for you? Fold.it utilizes your idle processor power to do it's magic. Russian bot.nets do it to spam everyone in your address book with penis enlargment e-mails. I can't see why NASA can't do this.
Haha that's awesome, the S's are awesome guitars. Yeah I've been on the hunt for a decently priced decimator for a while. Haven't used one but I'll take the tons of reviews about it as it probably works great haha.
Yea, only us redditors are smart enough to not have the wool pulled over our eyes!  /circlejerk
Karl actually looked to be enjoying himself at that part, he really got into it. Fair play to him for doing the centrifuge, though I would've loved to see him at zero G. Can't believe he didn't go up with them! Really enjoying this season, nice to see Russia's answer to Karl is a taxi driver!
Saw this on my front page, thought it was r/trees and also thought by quarter you meant a certain illicit substance. Was pleasantly disappointed.
))&lt;&gt;((   forever
Do you mainly have towers or rack units? I've found that rack units are like, six hundred percent noisier.
Especially the ones that feel like they're attached to your brain. I can't describe the feeling that pulls one of those things out and it feels like your pulling all the insides of your head out.
Now put the cheese under the sauce.
I can't be the only one who was expecting delicious fruit chews to emerge from the table.
Русские не лучше, к сожалению, а по этническому принципу нападать в ответ - глупо.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JKqV_ybCS-I
I know it was probably scary before knowing what was happening so this mostly just an FYI  - not trying to downplay what happened.  Multi-engine planes are always designed (by FAA regulations) to be able to fly after an engine fails. That includes climbing from the runway after take-off (regulations specify a certain glide-slope etc). Multi-engine pilot certifications (let alone airline transport pilot licenses, a much more training intensive accomplishment) require practicing flying with one engine shut down.
ending corporate corruption in washington by hitting one of its biggest sources.
and illicit oxy rings
How can you ban someone for butter knife remarks? I've said way worse.
Earlier he was seen complaining about "runnin' out of french fries an' burrito coverins".
If the process for moving to Portugal is manageable, then by all means do that. Just know that it's not your last option if the bureaucracy starts to bog down.
well, having a blog is a big help as you will probably update it more regularly than the front page, which makes google crawlers cache your site more often. Remember to choose a couple of keywords and focus on those and their variants when creating new content. Also, google has been doing [funky things with its algorithm lately](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Google_Panda) so social interaction is very important...what I mean is that you should definitely have all the social plugins to make your site easily "shearable", G+, Twitter, StumbleUpon, and anything people in your niche uses to share content. The point is not to be the only person pushing your site to everyone else but to create content which is relevant enough to go viral... you have a design studio...sharing your UX, CSS, HTML5, Ruby, PHP or whatever techniques with the public would be an idea...
Hell yea I agree with him!  OG CS wins every day.
TURBO PUNS
LOL
That might need to be a pretty hefty RCS. The shuttle uses aerodynamic control surfaces during reentry and it also has an RCS. I don't know all the details of the shuttle, but the body flap is essential to control it in pitch during reentry. i.e., they don't have enough control authority with just their RCS during that portion of flight.
If I buy a gift copy, and in month trade them, will the person recieving the gift get a G. Killer Exclusive?
1.  You should edit that for the folks who were wise enough not to click the image and actually see the spoiler.  Otherwise, you are the one spoiling it for them. 2.  That is precisely why it spoils the game.  People will now be anticipating it instead of being shocked and awed by what they've just seen.  Even if it doesn't happen, I will be waiting for it through the entire game now.  /sad face
The number of patients seen is dependent upon the number of doctors to a certain extent. Until the maximum number of possible patients is reached, more doctors will always imply more patients can be seen (ignoring spacial limitations). 
drag radials (which are not 'street' tyres in the strict sense. much like a gsx1000r is not a 'street bike' in the strict sense. It's a hair short of a full blown racing motorcycle) and quite wider than the one in the video of this reddit post. plus, they are *on the track* using whatever glue it is they are using when drag racing.  so no. the video you linked to has little in common with the decades old merc that supposedly has 1400hp and 195 width  i mean *come on*
Absolutely stellar.  I have no choice but to adopt this euphemism.
I do actually, and I have even done it my self.  When I am home tomorrow I can definitely post some useful stuff.  Btws though check craigslist for people getting rid of direct tv dishes.
Like you, making that post?
Thanks for clarifying, it actually seems like we agree, but maybe we are stating moderate positions which when read can be interpreted as more extreme positions! To be clear, I think there are drivers out there who do the worst imaginable embodiment of the 'teach you a lesson' type of driving and also drivers who are too absent minded or distracted from the task at hand - these are the drivers I take issue with. Personally, if you want to speed, great, it means you won't slow me down and if I let you pass me, you aren't endangering me any more than driving near cars observing the speed limit!  My problem with driving training in Australia is that is very easy to obtain a licence. For example, in scandinavian countries the driver training includes many experiences with controlled drifts on ice and other more advanced driving techniques because of the particular climate of the region and the importance the society places on safety/personal and community responsibility/education. I think there would be many advanced driving techniques, for example reading traffic flow, that would be essential for the Australian driving conditions that you really only learn about with time because our standards for licence issuing are so low, kids bearly know what they are doing when they hit the road solo.
Sure thing, boss.
These insider references are getting out of control.  I was  just here yesterday, and already I have no idea what the  hell is happening.  I wish people would quit being all hipster/inside-secretish  about this crap, and start being more up-front about whatever it is that they're referring to.
Giant. Farts.
*Raises hand*.
I got chills...
A 360 for $100 years ago on a black Friday sale 
I'm just curious as to where the murder took place on this [road](http://maps.google.com/maps?q=Morningstar+Road,+Auburn,+Indiana,+United+States&amp;hl=en&amp;sll=39.57169,-84.352341&amp;sspn=0.009296,0.021136&amp;vpsrc=0&amp;hnear=Morningstar+Rd,+Auburn,+DeKalb,+Indiana+46706&amp;t=h&amp;z=15).  I don't live anywhere near Indiana, so it's not like I'm looking to go visit or anything. I'm just curious because the road doesn't look so creepy (granted, it's 20 years later and only an aerial image).  
That I'm a bitch.  Actually not much of misconception now that I think about it.
If you don't like it, don't look at it, you fucking idiot.
On the other hand, sometimes all it takes is a serious setback to awaken your inner fighter.
You obviously haven't heard of Mt. Dora.
1997 Jazzmaster with a super distortion in the bridge, and I'm using a Mojo Hand Colossus fuzz mainly. It takes pedals extremely well, and the cleans seem to have a great range. Things can get a little bit country honk if you want, but it'll go creamy and bassy too and everything inbetween.   It'll play nice and quiet too, which kicks ass when it's late.
Here's a great article from Nate Silver about the statistics surrounding the ordeal:  http://fivethirtyeight.blogs.nytimes.com/2011/09/29/bill-buckner-strikes-again/
Did you get paid extra for falling on thumbtacks?
I was notified of a pay raise. :)
agreed, I'm assuming that post is at the top due to its target audience of:  [](/forever "guys that wish they were better at talking to women. ") 
HD camera.... :P  I'm not paying for her damned thighmaster....she broke 3 last week
Blocked in 10 seconds flat.
So did I when it was discovered hiding there in a big sketchpad. I have it framed now.
Nobody wants a child with down syndrome. It is good news knowing your child won't have down syndrome.
Sad and funny.  
I would have put it this way:  Her:  "What do you do for a living"  Me:  "I make in a day what you make in a week."  Her:  "Would you please place your penis in my mouth?"  Me:  "Probably."
Now that's a deal!
Man, I tell you what. To all the people complaining. It ain't so much the price as it is the luxury. Breakable is the new waterproof, but I'll be goddamned if it didn't scare the livin' jesus outta me the first time I popped it in half!
I did try  to use Quake Live once, actually. It just got stuck on a loading screen. Anyway, no, I don't have a mouse.
I'll be there!
Ugh. Well, I don't take pictures often, but [here.](http://i.imgur.com/72yW0.png)  It's a little misleading though. I joined roller derby soon after taking this pic, cut my hair short, dyed it blue, lost 30 pounds, and gained a lot of muscle. I really should take another picture.
We should start a campaign to move all our random stuff to this /r instead of Facebook then! :P
I was reading a few threads about people using triple displays in eyefinity mode, but in portrait instead of landscape. I don't have more than my build in monitor, but I wanted to give it a go anyways. 
i hope thats not a real sub reddit
Is as old as the internet.
I'm with you, that rail needs help. But still not retarded just need help.
John Williams (is the man)
me too man. im only 35-40 min away
[problem?](http://battellemedia.com/pencil.jpg)
Or those playing on DX8 where jarate is nearly unnoticeable.
VANCOUVER
NO! I already mod r/mlpdrawingschool... one role per pony. 
First picture is a person texting on their corporately provided phone. FFFUUUU. come on people. If you hate the beast why  you keep feeding it?
And he would've gotten away with it, too...
I'm in. I love these bundles.
It takes a higher kind of courage to do what you're doing. Thanks for your service.
I think it's more of a credit issue than anything else.  Have you talked to a human about it?
This. 
WHO WOULDVE FOUND IT? Who goes around lifting up random bricks?  It was a random place to hide it and there are trillions of other random places he couldve hid it and no one wouldve found it.  
They laugh at you because you'll be the first to break. Why do you feel entitled to have you student loans paid off. Why is that a better policy than the government paying off everyone's credit card debt or paying everyone's mortgage off? Why do you feel entitled to America's tax dollars more than a poor person who didn't go to school, or worked during school to not take off loans.  Seriously, this is a horrible idea.
Miss Missile Tits 1956.
Google: Project Varia. An 11 yr. old and his dad are building a Netflix suit/arm canon. They go into great detail about the build and what they use. 
Nope! Only on the tiny chat... and only some of the time.
Yes, it is. People can make up words, and this one is derived from actual Anglo-Saxon - "hund endleofantig." It's a modernized version.
Really like the bottle/glass/label. They complement each other
fuck you! can i come over?
Who is this?
hot dang, somebody's gettin' sued...
I wouldn't watch it.  Me and my whole phonebook would watch it!!  Call all of the friends!
Correct, if vegans want to make a moral distinction then so can I. ( p.s. I am a proud meat eater ) 
Power metal, progressive metal, chillout, cirque du soleil soundtracks; anything original sounding and melodic.
Added :D Enjoy
It's really dead, isn't it?
Printscreen? 
How very fun.  When my gram was alive I was not old enough to smoke with her.  She was a much calmer and nicer grandma when she smoked.. we had a very troubled relationship..But I have smoked with both my parents and my sis and I smoke all the time.
can I be a mod if I make more bad posts 
Really? I always thought they were, especially when one of the mods was saying they were sending out more matches later that day instead of just having them all sent out.
The very BEST video game stories are still pretty bad, so I think my answer to your last question is "yes".  That is not to say that the stories don't have some good parts, likeable characters, or great presentation.  I just simply mean that the actual plot, character arcs and all of those things which fundamentally make or break a story is NOT strong in any video game.  This is because of the harsh destructive relationship that games, which are non-linear, have on stories, which are linear.  More:  http://www.dinofarmgames.com/?p=219
Exactly... I'll drink a few of these and age the rest.
Yeah it's bad, but it sure as hell is memorable. It's one of my favorite WM moments. 
This is a tight game!  I don' care!
It makes my vagina wet, and I don't even have a vagina.
Dong roulette. 
You are correct.  H2H points first, then H2H GD, the H2H away goals, then general GD.
I'd charge the prof with breaking copyright laws; plagiarizing a Charlie Chaplin script.
They cost more than computers or tablets because apparently there are stores which are entirely willing to pay ten grand for a computer with a cash drawer attachment. In other news, I have a rock in my garden that keeps away tigers. 
yes, yes tell me more 
Wasn't there a Dirty Jobs about this?
Did you go to OP?
If you have "ladder fear" then you are just a little bitch, and nothing can help you.   loser
Yes, I've heard proof of the Eb2!! =D
No, I personally don't know of any harm resulting from r/jailbait. That doesn't mean it doesn't happen. That subreddit enables it.  And it's r/jailbait that made a "joke" about putting girls in vans. Nothing I could say could be more inflammatory than that.
Sometime the can doesn't open when you pull the wrapper off and you have to use a spoon AND THAT'S THE SCARIEST
[But wait, it gets Better!](http://www.reddit.com/r/Cooperjailbait)
Awww shit, didn't know that existed
so he's giving his/a copy away to people with quick response time? how's that asshole?
I don't want to aim at a light and fire. I want to aim at a player and fire. The glare is just absurd, not to mention grating. I'm fine with having something to give away snipers, however it doesn't have to be huge and as bright as a flashlight.   As for the flashlight, it shouldn't blind people in daylight and it shouldn't blind people at medium ranges or more. The laser is okay, but just seems a little silly. It gives away that you're aiming at them more than anything. 
 I love Royal Blue, the one on 360 has a bunch of lunch weekly lunch specials  Fridays they do Thai... and its AMAZING. 
I lol'd
There's a subreddit for rage comics at /r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu
Teacher?
I whole-heartedly support this algorithm!
The largest cost of any kindle is the e-ink screen.  60% of the kindle 3 cost, and the larger screen is quite a bit more expensive than the 7 inch one.
[I Eat...](http://qkme.me/354zeh)
Have you been on this website long? Shit in a bag is "reddit-worthy"
I've been thinking about it all day. I believe you're right.
What kind of beach do you go to that's set up "with the very clear intention of being sexually arousing?"  Do people masturbate there all the time?  Is there a sign out front saying "No minors allowed in due to adult content?"  No.  Because beaches aren't expressly designed to let people look at and jerk off to sexually suggestive pictures of teenagers.  Unlike /r/jailbait.
It's a joke. I don't remember the first time I heard it, but I'm guessing they said it better than I did.
I freaking want those bumper stickers!
Reminds me of House of Leaves vaguely.
As long as you're this hostile, a bridge of mutual respect and will never be built, and it will take a lot longer to effect the change you desire.   People hold their views deeply, and failing to respect that will lead to mutual hostility.  I know you want others to see the world the way you do, and maybe they should, maybe you're 100% correct. But these changes won't happen over night, but positive dialogue instead of ones laced with insults will get you to your goal quicker.  As the old saying goes, you catch more flies with honey than vinegar.   (Although ironically, vinegar is more attractive to fruit flies than honey... but the intent of the phrase is accurate) 
It's free on 360 too.
I always feel like a redneck when I tell a woman how beautiful her mouth is.  Might be your best feature, and that's quite a competition.  Maybe a close up of your lips slightly pursed as if you're kissing?  A lip licking smile, maybe?
I love Denali, it is simply awe inspiring in person.
I think Doa would be the most camera-friendly person to get to do this, though they'd need analysis to go with it. I suggest Orb.
Like I said, they are different. It's hard to give a game the same impact as a movie, because movies can kill characters, and have scenes that just..wouldn't work in a video game. You're right. I dunno. Heavy Rain is kind of on the way to doing things..sort of right. 
Was she stinky? Did you just have to live with the smell or did you do something about it?
SOLVED
Speed.
Wow.
I left BoA a long time ago, but only after several issues. One of the worst was, they processed someone else's check for a few hundred bucks, but one of the numbers in the account number was missing, so they just guessed the number, and took the money from my account. I didn't have much money at the time, so this resulted in several NSF fees on top of a negative balance. All was corrected after a trip to the bank, but seriously, WTF, didn't even bother to compare the name on the check to the name on my account, and it took them some time to find the original check to verify their mistake.
Quicktime events: the game
Our Thursday Blues Jam is open to anyone! It's hosted by The Cazanovas, we welcome anyone to come play!
It would be easier, if this were oblivion or it has the same rules/construction, to make your health drain unless you're carrying the reddit token.  Let's call it 50lbs of "survival ensurance"  :P  Effect description:  Karma's a bitch
Why is "Healthrobot" still around? -__-
POV?
so why the fuck are you doing it?
&gt; We are the 99 percent. We are getting kicked out of our homes. We are forced to choose between groceries and rent. We are denied quality medical care. We are suffering from environmental pollution. We are working long hours for little pay and no rights, if we're working at all. We are getting nothing while the other 1 percent is getting everything. We are the 99 percent.   Whaaa???   1% is the millionaires.  The upper middle class is 15%. They're not complaining about choosing between groceries.   No wonder you have so many school loans and no job. You can't do math!  Hell, I'm in this bracket and struggling to climb higher. You know how? By taking on as little debt as possible. Looking for advancements in my career. Diversifying my investments. Don't hand it all over to some guy who promised 20% annually.  People if it's too good to be true THEN IT IS.  How about instead of scrapping Obama-care, you bring home some troops, raise taxes - and not just on the "wealthy". Share the burden everyone. Doubling Warren Buffet's taxes isn't going to do shit.
I'm with you! daffy was always my fave. I remember when he shifted from wacky to disgruntled...good to see the old daffy back
Where are you that people are having drum circles in the middle of a ton of people who are going to be pissed off by it?
That's not really a safe rate to lose over the long term, if it doesn't slow down soon I would consider seeing a doctor.  If it slows down as I would expect, it was probably 80% water and shit that you passed between measurements.
Obama just killed a man because he said some things the government didn't like. That man was a US citizen and unless the FBI was actively courting him to become an active terrorist he wasn't much of a threat. The blew him up with a missile. He never saw the inside of a court room or confronted the witnesses against him.  They'll just start shooting whistleblowers in the head soon. 
"When" would be correct.
Tiberius
The irony, of course, is that the bunny is actually a lot funnier now.
Same, but Glenview (Northwest suburb)
A long shot... but Dad always told me to believe in myself.  So I'm going to say... Me. (reasons TBD).
